2155 | confident (adjective): sure of yourself and not afraid | loc: sebevědomý
  EN TS: That confident smile works.
  cz TS: Ten sebevědomý úsměv funguje.
  EN FS: That nervous smile works.
  cz FS: Ten nervózní úsměv funguje.
  EN TP: a confident half-smile
  cz TP: sebevědomý poloúsměv
  EN FP: a confident loud laugh
  cz FP: sebevědomý hlasitý smích
2156 | horizon (noun): the far line where land seems to meet sky | loc: horizont
  EN TS: The sun sits on the horizon.
  cz TS: Slunce sedí na horizontu.
  EN FS: The moon sits on the horizon.
  cz FS: Měsíc sedí na horizontu.
  EN TP: the sun on the horizon
  cz TP: slunce na horizontu
  EN FP: a ship on the horizon
  cz FP: loď na horizontu
2157 | india (noun): a large country in South Asia | loc: Indie
  EN TS: A baby from India wears gold.
  cz TS: Mimino z Indie má na sobě zlato.
  EN FS: A baby from India wears red.
  cz FS: Mimino z Indie má na sobě červenou.
  EN TP: a painting from India
  cz TP: obraz z Indie
  EN FP: a carpet from India
  cz FP: koberec z Indie
2158 | headscarf (noun): a cloth wrapped around the head | loc: šátek na hlavu
  EN TS: Love the orange headscarf!
  cz TS: Ten oranžový šátek na hlavu je super!
  EN FS: Love the blue headscarf!
  cz FS: Ten modrý šátek na hlavu je super!
  EN TP: an orange headscarf
  cz TP: oranžový šátek na hlavu
  EN FP: taking off a headscarf
  cz FP: sundávání šátku z hlavy
2159 | majestic (adjective): grand and impressive, like a king | loc: majestátní
  EN TS: The cat feels very majestic.
  cz TS: Kočka si připadá hodně majestátně.
  EN FS: The dog feels very majestic.
  cz FS: Pes si připadá hodně majestátně.
  EN TP: a majestic cat
  cz TP: majestátní kočka
  EN FP: a majestic lion
  cz FP: majestátní lev
2161 | genius (noun): an exceptionally intelligent person | loc: génius
  EN TS: The genius has a new idea.
  cz TS: Génius má nový nápad.
  EN FS: The genius has a new cat.
  cz FS: Génius má novou kočku.
  EN TP: a genius gazing at stars
  cz TP: génius hledící na hvězdy
  EN FP: a genius writing formulas
  cz FP: génius píšící vzorce
2162 | ginger (adjective): having orange-red hair | loc: zrzavý
  EN TS: Her ginger hair looks perfect.
  cz TS: Její zrzavé vlasy vypadají dokonale.
  EN FS: Her black hair looks perfect.
  cz FS: Její černé vlasy vypadají dokonale.
  EN TP: long ginger hair in waves
  cz TP: dlouhé zrzavé vlnité vlasy
  EN FP: ginger hair in a bun
  cz FP: zrzavé vlasy v drdolu
2164 | woods (noun): an area of land covered with trees | loc: les
  EN TS: A path goes into the woods. Who wants to go first?
  cz TS: Do lesa vede cesta. Kdo půjde první?
  EN FS: A river goes into the woods. Who wants to go first?
  cz FS: Do lesa teče řeka. Kdo půjde první?
  EN TP: a path through the woods
  cz TP: cesta lesem
  EN FP: a cabin in the woods
  cz FP: chata v lese
2172 | sports car (noun): a fast low car built for speed and fun | loc: sportovní auto
  EN TS: A sports car in a paint storm.
  cz TS: Sportovní auto v bouři barev.
  EN FS: A sports car in a snow storm.
  cz FS: Sportovní auto ve sněhové bouři.
  EN TP: a dark-blue sports car
  cz TP: tmavě modré sportovní auto
  EN FP: a dark-blue family car
  cz FP: tmavě modré rodinné auto
2174 | bloom (verb): to open flowers; to be full of flowers | loc: kvést | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: A tree is blooming in snow!
  cz TS: Strom kvete ve sněhu!
  EN FS: A tree is burning in snow!
  cz FS: Strom hoří ve sněhu!
  EN TP: a tree blooming at night
  cz TP: strom kvetoucí v noci
  EN FP: flowers blooming in spring
  cz FP: květiny kvetoucí na jaře
2175 | midnight (noun): twelve o'clock at night | loc: půlnoc
  EN TS: Midnight in the pine forest.
  cz TS: Půlnoc v borovém lese.
  EN FS: Midnight in the desert.
  cz FS: Půlnoc v poušti.
  EN TP: midnight under the stars
  cz TP: půlnoc pod hvězdami
  EN FP: a party at midnight
  cz FP: párty o půlnoci
2176 | aisle (noun): a narrow walkway between rows of shelves | loc: ulička
  EN TS: It is raining in the aisle!
  cz TS: V uličce prší!
  EN FS: It is snowing in the aisle!
  cz FS: V uličce sněží!
  EN TP: a rainy library aisle
  cz TP: deštivá ulička v knihovně
  EN FP: a busy supermarket aisle
  cz FP: plná ulička v supermarketu
2177 | dj (noun): someone who plays and mixes recorded music | loc: dýdžej
  EN TS: Even the moon came for the DJ!
  cz TS: I měsíc přišel kvůli dýdžejovi!
  EN FS: Even the sun came for the DJ!
  cz FS: I slunce přišlo kvůli dýdžejovi!
  EN TP: a DJ on the street
  cz TP: dýdžej na ulici
  EN FP: a DJ in a club
  cz FP: dýdžej v klubu
2178 | peek (verb): to take a quick secret look from hiding | loc: kouknout | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Psst, two cats are peeking.
  cz TS: Pst, dvě kočky koukají.
  EN FS: Psst, two dogs are peeking.
  cz FS: Pst, dva psi koukají.
  EN TP: peeking behind leaves
  cz TP: koukání zpoza listí
  EN FP: peeking through a window
  cz FP: koukání z okna
2181 | crowded (adjective): uncomfortably full of people | loc: přeplněný
  EN TS: The street is way too crowded.
  cz TS: Ulice je fakt moc přeplněná.
  EN FS: The street is way too empty.
  cz FS: Ulice je fakt moc prázdná.
  EN TP: a crowded neon street
  cz TP: přeplněná neonová ulice
  EN FP: a crowded train carriage
  cz FP: přeplněný vagon vlaku
2182 | hiker (noun): a person who walks long distances in nature | loc: turista
  EN TS: The hiker has a red backpack.
  cz TS: Turista má červený batoh.
  EN FS: The hiker has a blue backpack.
  cz FS: Turista má modrý batoh.
  EN TP: a hiker on a ledge
  cz TP: turista na skalní římse
  EN FP: a hiker in a tent
  cz FP: turista ve stanu
2184 | roar (verb): to make a loud, deep angry cry | loc: řvát | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The tiger is roaring!
  cz TS: Tygr řve!
  EN FS: The lion is roaring!
  cz FS: Lev řve!
  EN TP: a roaring tiger
  cz TP: řvoucí tygr
  EN FP: a sleeping tiger
  cz FP: spící tygr
2185 | pianist (noun): a person who plays the piano | loc: klavírista
  EN TS: The pianist has blonde hair.
  cz TS: Klavírista má blond vlasy.
  EN FS: The pianist has black hair.
  cz FS: Klavírista má černé vlasy.
  EN TP: a pianist at the piano
  cz TP: klavírista u klavíru
  EN FP: a pianist at a keyboard
  cz FP: klavírista u keyboardu
2186 | thorn (noun): a sharp spike growing on a plant stem | loc: trn
  EN TS: Jesus wears a crown of thorns.
  cz TS: Ježíš nosí korunu z trnů.
  EN FS: Jesus wears a crown of gold.
  cz FS: Ježíš nosí korunu ze zlata.
  EN TP: a crown of thorns
  cz TP: koruna z trnů
  EN FP: a rose with thorns
  cz FP: růže s trny
2187 | buddha (noun): the founder of Buddhism, shown meditating | loc: Buddha
  EN TS: Buddha is meditating.
  cz TS: Buddha medituje.
  EN FS: Buddha is dancing.
  cz FS: Buddha tančí.
  EN TP: Buddha meditating
  cz TP: meditující Buddha
  EN FP: Buddha lying down
  cz FP: ležící Buddha
2188 | cry (verb): to shed tears because of sadness or pain | loc: plakat | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The boy is crying, Mom isn't.
  cz TS: Kluk pláče, máma ne.
  EN FS: The boy is singing, Mom isn't.
  cz FS: Kluk zpívá, máma ne.
  EN TP: crying on a bike
  cz TP: plakat na kole
  EN FP: crying in bed
  cz FP: plakat v posteli
2189 | fall overboard (phrase): to fall off a boat into the water | loc: spadnout přes palubu
  EN TS: Someone is falling overboard!
  cz TS: Někdo padá přes palubu!
  EN FS: Someone is diving overboard!
  cz FS: Někdo skáče přes palubu!
  EN TP: falling overboard backwards
  cz TP: spadnout přes palubu pozpátku
  EN FP: falling asleep in the boat
  cz FP: usnout v lodi
2190 | villain (noun): an evil character in a story or film | loc: padouch
  EN TS: This villain has flaming eyes.
  cz TS: Tenhle padouch má planoucí oči.
  EN FS: This villain has blue eyes.
  cz FS: Tenhle padouch má modré oči.
  EN TP: a villain in burning ruins
  cz TP: padouch v hořících troskách
  EN FP: a villain in a castle
  cz FP: padouch na hradě
2191 | android (noun): a robot built to look like a human | loc: android
  EN TS: The android has a human face.
  cz TS: Android má lidskou tvář.
  EN FS: The android has a long beard.
  cz FS: Android má dlouhé vousy.
  EN TP: a glowing female android
  cz TP: zářící ženský android
  EN FP: an android in a kitchen
  cz FP: android v kuchyni
2192 | flask (noun): a narrow-necked glass container for liquids | loc: baňka
  EN TS: Harry Potter would love these flasks.
  cz TS: Harry Potter by tyhle baňky miloval.
  EN FS: Harry Potter would love these brooms.
  cz FS: Harry Potter by tahle košťata miloval.
  EN TP: glowing glass flasks
  cz TP: zářící skleněné baňky
  EN FP: a thermos flask
  cz FP: termoska na čaj
2194 | tropical (adjective): from the hot wet regions near the equator | loc: tropický
  EN TS: Tropical leaves are big. Wow.
  cz TS: Tropické listy jsou velké. Wow.
  EN FS: Tropical leaves are tiny. Wow.
  cz FS: Tropické listy jsou malinké. Wow.
  EN TP: dense tropical leaves
  cz TP: husté tropické listy
  EN FP: a tropical beach
  cz FP: tropická pláž
2195 | watercolor (noun): water-based paint, and pictures made with it | loc: akvarel
  EN TS: The watercolor is dripping.
  cz TS: Akvarel stéká.
  EN FS: The oil paint is dripping.
  cz FS: Olejová barva stéká.
  EN TP: a watercolor portrait
  cz TP: portrét akvarelem
  EN FP: a watercolor landscape
  cz FP: krajina akvarelem
2199 | delicate (adjective): fine, soft and easily damaged | loc: jemný
  EN TS: Delicate roses everywhere!
  cz TS: Všude jemné růže!
  EN FS: Delicate tulips everywhere!
  cz FS: Všude jemné tulipány!
  EN TP: delicate pink roses
  cz TP: jemné růžové růže
  EN FP: a delicate glass vase
  cz FP: jemná skleněná váza
2200 | elegant (adjective): graceful and stylish to look at | loc: elegantní
  EN TS: She looks elegant in her gown.
  cz TS: V té róbě vypadá elegantně.
  EN FS: She looks elegant in her coat.
  cz FS: V tom kabátě vypadá elegantně.
  EN TP: an elegant flowing gown
  cz TP: elegantní splývavá róba
  EN FP: an elegant black suit
  cz FP: elegantní černý oblek
2201 | orange (adjective): having the color between red and yellow | loc: oranžový
  EN TS: Her orange armour is so cool!
  cz TS: Její oranžové brnění je tak cool!
  EN FS: Her pink armour is so cool!
  cz FS: Její růžové brnění je tak cool!
  EN TP: orange hair and armour
  cz TP: oranžové vlasy a brnění
  EN FP: an orange in her hand
  cz FP: pomeranč v její ruce
2202 | smart (adjective): neat and well-dressed, not scruffy | loc: elegantní
  EN TS: His white blazer looks smart.
  cz TS: Jeho bílé sako vypadá elegantně.
  EN FS: His red blazer looks smart.
  cz FS: Jeho červené sako vypadá elegantně.
  EN TP: a smart white blazer
  cz TP: elegantní bílé sako
  EN FP: a smart dark suit
  cz FP: elegantní tmavý oblek
2204 | lamb (noun): a baby sheep | loc: jehně
  EN TS: He is holding a lamb.
  cz TS: Drží jehně.
  EN FS: He is holding a dog.
  cz FS: Drží psa.
  EN TP: a lamb in his arms
  cz TP: jehně v náručí
  EN FP: a lamb in a field
  cz FP: jehně na louce
2207 | point (verb): to indicate a direction or thing with your finger | loc: ukázat | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The robot hand is pointing.
  cz TS: Robotická ruka ukazuje.
  EN FS: The robot hand is waving.
  cz FS: Robotická ruka mává.
  EN TP: pointing at a screen
  cz TP: ukazování na obrazovku
  EN FP: pointing at the sky
  cz FP: ukazování na nebe
2208 | pink (adjective): a light shade of red | loc: růžová
  EN TS: Her hair is bright pink.
  cz TS: Její vlasy jsou zářivě růžové.
  EN FS: Her hair is bright green.
  cz FS: Její vlasy jsou zářivě zelené.
  EN TP: bright pink hair
  cz TP: zářivě růžové vlasy
  EN FP: a bright pink dress
  cz FP: zářivě růžové šaty
2211 | trident (noun): a spear with three sharp points | loc: trojzubec
  EN TS: Guess who has a trident? The sea god.
  cz TS: Hádej, kdo má trojzubec? Bůh moře.
  EN FS: Guess who has a hammer? The sea god.
  cz FS: Hádej, kdo má kladivo? Bůh moře.
  EN TP: a god with a trident
  cz TP: bůh s trojzubcem
  EN FP: a trident in the sand
  cz FP: trojzubec v písku
2212 | stripes (noun): long thin lines of a different color | loc: pruhy
  EN TS: Nice stripes, tiger!
  cz TS: Pěkné pruhy, tygře!
  EN FS: Nice spots, tiger!
  cz FS: Pěkné skvrny, tygře!
  EN TP: a tiger with black stripes
  cz TP: tygr s černými pruhy
  EN FP: a zebra with black stripes
  cz FP: zebra s černými pruhy
2213 | ram (noun): a male sheep with big curved horns | loc: beran
  EN TS: Fact: rams have curly horns.
  cz TS: Fakt: berani mají zatočené rohy.
  EN FS: Fact: rams have flat horns.
  cz FS: Fakt: berani mají ploché rohy.
  EN TP: a ram with curly horns
  cz TP: beran se zatočenými rohy
  EN FP: a ram eating grass
  cz FP: beran spásající trávu
2214 | through (preposition): from one side of an opening to the other | loc: skrz
  EN TS: I can see a castle through it.
  cz TS: Skrz to vidím hrad.
  EN FS: I can see a church through it.
  cz FS: Skrz to vidím kostel.
  EN TP: looking through a rock hole
  cz TP: pohled skrz díru ve skále
  EN FP: looking through a window
  cz FP: pohled skrz okno
2216 | altar (noun): a raised table where people pray | loc: oltář
  EN TS: She is praying at an altar.
  cz TS: Modlí se u oltáře.
  EN FS: She is singing at an altar.
  cz FS: Zpívá u oltáře.
  EN TP: praying at a candlelit altar
  cz TP: modlitba u oltáře se svíčkami
  EN FP: getting married at the altar
  cz FP: svatba u oltáře
2217 | spell (noun): words or power used to make magic happen | loc: kouzlo | translator note: FP pun "spell of bad weather" does not work in Czech; used a card trick
  EN TS: She's casting a spell. Cool.
  cz TS: Sesílá kouzlo. Hustý.
  EN FS: She's casting a net. Cool.
  cz FS: Nahazuje síť. Hustý.
  EN TP: casting a magic spell
  cz TP: sesílání kouzla
  EN FP: a spell of bad weather
  cz FP: kouzlo s kartami
2218 | circuit (noun): the path electricity follows on a board | loc: obvod
  EN TS: Circuits are all around him.
  cz TS: Všude kolem něj jsou obvody.
  EN FS: Flowers are all around him.
  cz FS: Všude kolem něj jsou květiny.
  EN TP: glowing circuit lines
  cz TP: zářící linky obvodů
  EN FP: a race circuit
  cz FP: závodní okruh
2220 | count (verb): to find out the number or amount of something | loc: počítat
  EN TS: He is counting the money carefully.
  cz TS: Pečlivě počítá peníze.
  EN FS: He is counting the coins carefully.
  cz FS: Pečlivě počítá mince.
  EN TP: counting a stack of bills
  cz TP: počítání štosu bankovek
  EN FP: counting down the seconds
  cz FP: odpočítávání sekund
2224 | hold hands (phrase): to walk or stand with your fingers joined | loc: držet se za ruce
  EN TS: They are holding hands.
  cz TS: Drží se za ruce.
  EN FS: They are shaking hands.
  cz FS: Podávají si ruce.
  EN TP: holding hands in the rain
  cz TP: drží se za ruce v dešti
  EN FP: holding hands in the sun
  cz FP: drží se za ruce na slunci
2225 | soaked (adjective): completely wet, right through | loc: promočený
  EN TS: Poor girl, her hair is soaked.
  cz TS: Chudák holka, vlasy má promočené.
  EN FS: Poor girl, her hair is dry.
  cz FS: Chudák holka, vlasy má suché.
  EN TP: soaked in heavy rain
  cz TP: promočená v silném dešti
  EN FP: soaked in hot water
  cz FP: promočená v horké vodě
2226 | bracelet (noun): a band wrapped around the wrist | loc: náramek
  EN TS: He has golden bracelets.
  cz TS: Má zlaté náramky.
  EN FS: He has golden gloves.
  cz FS: Má zlaté rukavice.
  EN TP: golden bracelets on wrists
  cz TP: zlaté náramky na zápěstích
  EN FP: a bracelet in a shop
  cz FP: náramek v obchodě
2227 | glance (verb): to look at something quickly | loc: letmo pohlédnout
  EN TS: She is glancing back. At you?
  cz TS: Letmo pohlíží dozadu. Na tebe?
  EN FS: She is glancing down. At you?
  cz FS: Letmo pohlíží dolů. Na tebe?
  EN TP: glancing over her shoulder
  cz TP: letmý pohled přes rameno
  EN FP: glancing at her phone
  cz FP: letmý pohled na mobil
2228 | above (preposition): higher than something, over it | loc: nad
  EN TS: She is sitting above the city.
  cz TS: Sedí nad městem.
  EN FS: She is sitting above the sea.
  cz FS: Sedí nad mořem.
  EN TP: high above the city
  cz TP: vysoko nad městem
  EN FP: above the clouds
  cz FP: nad mraky
2231 | sphinx (noun): an Egyptian statue: human head, lion body | loc: sfinga
  EN TS: A giant golden sphinx.
  cz TS: Obří zlatá sfinga.
  EN FS: A giant silver sphinx.
  cz FS: Obří stříbrná sfinga.
  EN TP: a golden sphinx statue
  cz TP: socha zlaté sfingy
  EN FP: a sphinx cat sleeping
  cz FP: spící kočka sfinga
2232 | peaceful (adjective): not disturbed by fighting or trouble | loc: klidný
  EN TS: The Buddha looks peaceful.
  cz TS: Buddha vypadá klidně.
  EN FS: The Buddha looks angry.
  cz FS: Buddha vypadá naštvaně.
  EN TP: a peaceful golden Buddha
  cz TP: klidný zlatý Buddha
  EN FP: a peaceful golden temple
  cz FP: klidný zlatý chrám
2233 | baseball (noun): a game where you hit a ball with a bat and run | loc: baseball
  EN TS: She has two baseball gloves.
  cz TS: Má dvě baseballové rukavice.
  EN FS: She has two baseball bats.
  cz FS: Má dvě baseballové pálky.
  EN TP: baseball gloves in both hands
  cz TP: baseballové rukavice v obou rukou
  EN FP: baseball on television
  cz FP: baseball v televizi
2234 | muscles (noun): the strong parts that move your body | loc: svaly
  EN TS: The warrior has big muscles.
  cz TS: Válečník má velké svaly.
  EN FS: The warrior has a big shield.
  cz FS: Válečník má velký štít.
  EN TP: a warrior's big muscles
  cz TP: velké svaly válečníka
  EN FP: a warrior's big shield
  cz FP: velký štít válečníka
2235 | profile (noun): the side view of a person's face | loc: profil
  EN TS: He is shown in full profile.
  cz TS: Je zobrazen přesně z profilu.
  EN FS: He is shown from the back.
  cz FS: Je zobrazen zezadu.
  EN TP: a man in full profile
  cz TP: muž z profilu
  EN FP: a profile picture online
  cz FP: profilová fotka na sítích
2236 | palace (noun): a large grand house where a king lives | loc: palác
  EN TS: Palace under a huge moon. Wow!
  cz TS: Palác pod obřím měsícem. Páni!
  EN FS: Palace under a huge sun. Wow!
  cz FS: Palác pod obřím sluncem. Páni!
  EN TP: a palace in the mountains
  cz TP: palác v horách
  EN FP: a palace in the desert
  cz FP: palác v poušti
2237 | shiny (adjective): reflecting light | loc: lesklý
  EN TS: Look at this shiny yellow car!
  cz TS: Koukni na tohle lesklé žluté auto!
  EN FS: Look at this shiny red car!
  cz FS: Koukni na tohle lesklé červené auto!
  EN TP: a shiny yellow car
  cz TP: lesklé žluté auto
  EN FP: a shiny yellow bus
  cz FP: lesklý žlutý autobus
2238 | mosque (noun): a building where Muslims go to pray | loc: mešita
  EN TS: The mosque has many domes.
  cz TS: Mešita má spoustu kopulí.
  EN FS: The mosque has one dome.
  cz FS: Mešita má jednu kopuli.
  EN TP: a grand mosque with domes
  cz TP: velkolepá mešita s kopulemi
  EN FP: a mosque in the desert
  cz FP: mešita v poušti
2242 | flock (noun): a group of birds together | loc: hejno
  EN TS: The flock has zero free seats.
  cz TS: Hejno má nula volných míst.
  EN FS: The flock has many free seats.
  cz FS: Hejno má spoustu volných míst.
  EN TP: a flock of small birds
  cz TP: hejno malých ptáků
  EN FP: a flock of sheep
  cz FP: stádo ovcí
2245 | overgrown (adjective): covered by plants growing out of control | loc: zarostlý
  EN TS: It's just a bit overgrown.
  cz TS: Je to jen trochu zarostlé.
  EN FS: It's just a bit snowy.
  cz FS: Je to jen trochu zasněžené.
  EN TP: an overgrown cottage
  cz TP: zarostlá chalupa
  EN FP: an overgrown lawn
  cz FP: zarostlý trávník
2246 | miniature (adjective): a very small copy of something bigger | loc: miniaturní
  EN TS: The display features a miniature cottage.
  cz TS: Expozice představuje miniaturní chaloupku.
  EN FS: The display features a miniature castle.
  cz FS: Expozice představuje miniaturní hrad.
  EN TP: a miniature night garden
  cz TP: miniaturní noční zahrada
  EN FP: a miniature train set
  cz FP: miniaturní vláčkodráha
2247 | scotland (noun): a country in the north of Great Britain | loc: Skotsko
  EN TS: Scotland has a lonely church.
  cz TS: Skotsko má osamělý kostel.
  EN FS: Scotland has a lonely castle.
  cz FS: Skotsko má osamělý hrad.
  EN TP: a church in Scotland
  cz TP: kostel ve Skotsku
  EN FP: a castle in Scotland
  cz FP: hrad ve Skotsku
2248 | graceful (adjective): moving in a smooth, beautiful, elegant way | loc: půvabný
  EN TS: She is floating gracefully.
  cz TS: Půvabně se vznáší.
  EN FS: She is dancing gracefully.
  cz FS: Půvabně tančí.
  EN TP: floating gracefully in the air
  cz TP: půvabné vznášení ve vzduchu
  EN FP: a graceful dance on stage
  cz FP: půvabný tanec na pódiu
2249 | steampunk (adjective): a fantasy style of old brass machines and gears | loc: steampunk
  EN TS: A steampunk city of gears.
  cz TS: Steampunkové město z ozubených kol.
  EN FS: A steampunk city of glass.
  cz FS: Steampunkové město ze skla.
  EN TP: brass steampunk towers
  cz TP: mosazné steampunkové věže
  EN FP: a steampunk costume party
  cz FP: steampunková kostýmová párty
2250 | gaze (verb): to look at something steadily for a long time | loc: upřeně hledět
  EN TS: She is gazing at the city.
  cz TS: Upřeně hledí na město.
  EN FS: She is gazing at the sea.
  cz FS: Upřeně hledí na moře.
  EN TP: gazing at a rainy city
  cz TP: upřeně hledět na deštivé město
  EN FP: gazing at a starry sky
  cz FP: upřeně hledět na hvězdné nebe
2251 | robe (noun): a long loose piece of clothing | loc: roucho
  EN TS: Heaven's dress code: a white robe.
  cz TS: Dress code v nebi: bílé roucho.
  EN FS: Heaven's dress code: a black robe.
  cz FS: Dress code v nebi: černé roucho.
  EN TP: a long white robe
  cz TP: dlouhé bílé roucho
  EN FP: a robe with a hood
  cz FP: roucho s kapucí
2254 | frozen (adjective): turned to ice or completely covered in ice | loc: zmrzlý
  EN TS: A frozen palace. Hi, Elsa!
  cz TS: Zmrzlý palác. Ahoj, Elso!
  EN FS: A frozen lake. Hi, Elsa!
  cz FS: Zmrzlé jezero. Ahoj, Elso!
  EN TP: a frozen snowy palace
  cz TP: zmrzlý zasněžený palác
  EN FP: frozen peas in a bag
  cz FP: zmrzlý hrášek v sáčku
2256 | mechanical (adjective): made of machine parts and worked by machine | loc: mechanický
  EN TS: Her legs are fully mechanical.
  cz TS: Její nohy jsou úplně mechanické.
  EN FS: Her legs are fully wooden.
  cz FS: Její nohy jsou úplně dřevěné.
  EN TP: mechanical arms and legs
  cz TP: mechanické ruce a nohy
  EN FP: a mechanical watch
  cz FP: mechanické hodinky
2257 | eyebrows (noun): the lines of hair above your eyes | loc: obočí
  EN TS: Her eyebrows are very dark.
  cz TS: Její obočí je hodně tmavé.
  EN FS: Her eyebrows are very light.
  cz FS: Její obočí je hodně světlé.
  EN TP: thick dark eyebrows
  cz TP: husté tmavé obočí
  EN FP: thin blond eyebrows
  cz FP: tenké blond obočí
2258 | spire (noun): a tall thin pointed top on a tower | loc: špičatá věž
  EN TS: The church has a tall spire.
  cz TS: Kostel má vysokou špičatou věž.
  EN FS: The church has a round dome.
  cz FS: Kostel má kulatou kopuli.
  EN TP: a tall church spire
  cz TP: vysoká špičatá věž kostela
  EN FP: a spire on a castle
  cz FP: špičatá věž na hradě
2259 | lagoon (noun): a calm pool of sea water behind rocks | loc: laguna
  EN TS: Take me to this lagoon now!
  cz TS: Vezmi mě k téhle laguně, hned!
  EN FS: Take me to this glacier now!
  cz FS: Vezmi mě k tomuhle ledovci, hned!
  EN TP: a turquoise lagoon with palms
  cz TP: tyrkysová laguna s palmami
  EN FP: a frozen lagoon in winter
  cz FP: zamrzlá laguna v zimě
2260 | rowboat (noun): a small open boat moved with oars | loc: veslice
  EN TS: Poor rowboat, nobody wants it.
  cz TS: Chudák veslice, nikdo ji nechce.
  EN FS: Poor ship, nobody wants it.
  cz FS: Chudák loď, nikdo ji nechce.
  EN TP: an empty wooden rowboat
  cz TP: prázdná dřevěná veslice
  EN FP: a rowboat full of people
  cz FP: veslice plná lidí
2262 | connect (verb): to join two people or things together | loc: spojit
  EN TS: Dots and lines connect them.
  cz TS: Tečky a čáry je spojují.
  EN FS: Dots and lines divide them.
  cz FS: Tečky a čáry je rozdělují.
  EN TP: lines connecting two people
  cz TP: čáry spojující dva lidi
  EN FP: a cable connecting a phone
  cz FP: kabel spojující telefon
2268 | tightrope (noun): a rope stretched high for acrobats to cross | loc: napnuté lano
  EN TS: She is on a tightrope. No net!
  cz TS: Je na napnutém laně. Bez sítě!
  EN FS: She is on a ladder. No net!
  cz FS: Je na žebříku. Bez sítě!
  EN TP: balancing on a tightrope
  cz TP: balancování na napnutém laně
  EN FP: a circus tightrope act
  cz FP: cirkusové číslo na laně
2269 | blouse (noun): a loose light shirt worn by women | loc: halenka
  EN TS: Her blouse is loose and white.
  cz TS: Její halenka je volná a bílá.
  EN FS: Her dress is loose and white.
  cz FS: Její šaty jsou volné a bílé.
  EN TP: a loose white blouse
  cz TP: volná bílá halenka
  EN FP: a tight black blouse
  cz FP: upnutá černá halenka
2271 | corridor (noun): a long narrow passage inside a building | loc: chodba
  EN TS: She is chilling in a corridor.
  cz TS: Chilluje na chodbě.
  EN FS: She is chilling in a kitchen.
  cz FS: Chilluje v kuchyni.
  EN TP: a spaceship corridor
  cz TP: chodba vesmírné lodi
  EN FP: a hospital corridor
  cz FP: nemocniční chodba
2273 | jeans (noun): trousers made of strong blue cotton | loc: džíny
  EN TS: Ripped jeans, full denim look.
  cz TS: Roztrhané džíny a celý outfit z denimu.
  EN FS: Ripped jeans, full black look.
  cz FS: Roztrhané džíny a celý outfit černý.
  EN TP: heavily ripped blue jeans
  cz TP: hodně roztrhané modré džíny
  EN FP: ironing blue jeans
  cz FP: žehlení modrých džínů
2274 | lace (noun): fine cloth with open patterns of threads | loc: krajka
  EN TS: That lace collar is so fancy!
  cz TS: Ten límec z krajky je tak nóbl!
  EN FS: That fur collar is so fancy!
  cz FS: Ten límec z kožešiny je tak nóbl!
  EN TP: an ornate lace collar
  cz TP: zdobný límec z krajky
  EN FP: tying a shoe lace
  cz FP: zavazování tkaničky
2275 | outfit (noun): the set of clothes worn together | loc: outfit
  EN TS: Nice outfit, big sneakers!
  cz TS: Pěkný outfit, obří tenisky!
  EN FS: Nice outfit, tiny sneakers!
  cz FS: Pěkný outfit, maličké tenisky!
  EN TP: a street style outfit
  cz TP: streetový outfit
  EN FP: an outfit for a wedding
  cz FP: outfit na svatbu
2278 | look up (phrase): to raise your eyes to see something above | loc: podívat se nahoru
  EN TS: He is looking up at the sky.
  cz TS: Dívá se nahoru na nebe.
  EN FS: He is looking up at a plane.
  cz FS: Dívá se nahoru na letadlo.
  EN TP: to look up at clouds
  cz TP: podívat se nahoru na mraky
  EN FP: to look up a word
  cz FP: vyhledat slovo ve slovníku
2280 | embrace (verb): to put your arms around someone | loc: obejmout | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is embracing her at sunset.
  cz TS: Objímá ji při západu slunce.
  EN FS: He is embracing her in a car.
  cz FS: Objímá ji v autě.
  EN TP: embracing on a sailing boat
  cz TP: objetí na plachetnici
  EN FP: embracing a new idea
  cz FP: přijmout nový nápad
2282 | sailing (noun): the sport of travelling on a boat with wind power | loc: plachtění
  EN TS: Sailing at sunset. So chill.
  cz TS: Plachtění při západu slunce. Pohodička.
  EN FS: Surfing at sunset. So chill.
  cz FS: Surfování při západu slunce. Pohodička.
  EN TP: sailing at sunset
  cz TP: plachtění při západu slunce
  EN FP: sailing in a storm
  cz FP: plachtění v bouři
2284 | hairstyle (noun): the way someone's hair is cut and arranged | loc: účes
  EN TS: Feathers? Bold hairstyle.
  cz TS: Peří? Odvážný účes.
  EN FS: Pearls? Bold hairstyle.
  cz FS: Perly? Odvážný účes.
  EN TP: a hairstyle of feathers
  cz TP: účes z peří
  EN FP: a short hairstyle
  cz FP: krátký účes
2285 | sweatshirt (noun): a warm soft long-sleeved top, often oversized | loc: mikina
  EN TS: Her sweatshirt is huge.
  cz TS: Její mikina je obří.
  EN FS: Her backpack is huge.
  cz FS: Její batoh je obří.
  EN TP: a big blue sweatshirt
  cz TP: velká modrá mikina
  EN FP: a sweatshirt on a chair
  cz FP: mikina na židli
2287 | grief (noun): deep sadness, especially after losing someone | loc: žal
  EN TS: He is sitting alone in grief.
  cz TS: Sedí sám, ponořený v žalu.
  EN FS: He is sitting alone in a car.
  cz FS: Sedí sám v autě.
  EN TP: grief in a dark garden
  cz TP: žal v temné zahradě
  EN FP: grief at a funeral
  cz FP: žal na pohřbu
2288 | crop top (noun): a short top that leaves the stomach bare | loc: crop top
  EN TS: Crop top at the marina.
  cz TS: Crop top v přístavu.
  EN FS: Crop top at the ski resort.
  cz FS: Crop top na sjezdovce.
  EN TP: a black crop top
  cz TP: černý crop top
  EN FP: a white crop top
  cz FP: bílý crop top
2291 | asteroid (noun): a rock that flies through space | loc: asteroid
  EN TS: Just a few asteroids. Relax.
  cz TS: Jen pár asteroidů. V klidu.
  EN FS: Just a few birds. Relax.
  cz FS: Jen pár ptáků. V klidu.
  EN TP: floating asteroids
  cz TP: poletující asteroidy
  EN FP: an asteroid hitting Earth
  cz FP: asteroid dopadající na Zemi
2295 | sleeve (noun): the part of a garment that covers the arm | loc: rukáv
  EN TS: Those sleeves are enormous!
  cz TS: Ty rukávy jsou obrovské!
  EN FS: Those boots are enormous!
  cz FS: Ty boty jsou obrovské!
  EN TP: wide white sleeves
  cz TP: široké bílé rukávy
  EN FP: short black sleeves
  cz FP: krátké černé rukávy
2296 | floral (adjective): decorated with a flower pattern | loc: květinový
  EN TS: Her floral dress matches the wall!
  cz TS: Její květinové šaty ladí se zdí!
  EN FS: Her striped dress matches the wall!
  cz FS: Její pruhované šaty ladí se zdí!
  EN TP: an orange floral dress
  cz TP: oranžové květinové šaty
  EN FP: a floral beach shirt
  cz FP: květinová plážová košile
2297 | shore (noun): the land along the edge of the sea or a lake | loc: břeh
  EN TS: Waves are hitting the shore.
  cz TS: Vlny narážejí na břeh.
  EN FS: Waves are hitting the boat.
  cz FS: Vlny narážejí na loď.
  EN TP: palm trees on the shore
  cz TP: palmy na břehu
  EN FP: a boat on the shore
  cz FP: loď na břehu
2300 | on fire (phrase): burning with flames | loc: v plamenech
  EN TS: The guitar is on fire!
  cz TS: Kytara je v plamenech!
  EN FS: The piano is on fire!
  cz FS: Klavír je v plamenech!
  EN TP: a guitar on fire
  cz TP: kytara v plamenech
  EN FP: a house on fire
  cz FP: dům v plamenech
2301 | launch (verb): to send a rocket up into space | loc: vypustit | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The shuttle is being launched.
  cz TS: Raketoplán právě vypouštějí.
  EN FS: The plane is being launched.
  cz FS: Letadlo právě vypouštějí.
  EN TP: launching a space shuttle
  cz TP: vypuštění raketoplánu
  EN FP: launching a new product
  cz FP: uvedení nového produktu
2302 | weightless (adjective): floating freely because gravity does not pull | loc: beztížný
  EN TS: He is weightless and relaxed.
  cz TS: Je beztížný a uvolněný.
  EN FS: He is weightless and scared.
  cz FS: Je beztížný a vyděšený.
  EN TP: a weightless astronaut
  cz TP: beztížný astronaut
  EN FP: a weightless feather
  cz FP: beztížné pírko
2305 | rocky (adjective): covered with rocks and stones | loc: skalnatý
  EN TS: A rocky road to a lighthouse.
  cz TS: Skalnatá cesta k majáku.
  EN FS: A rocky road to a castle.
  cz FS: Skalnatá cesta k hradu.
  EN TP: a rocky headland
  cz TP: skalnatý mys
  EN FP: a rocky beach with sunbeds
  cz FP: skalnatá pláž s lehátky
2306 | countryside (noun): land with fields and villages, away from towns | loc: venkov
  EN TS: The countryside never ends.
  cz TS: Venkov nemá konce.
  EN FS: The city never ends.
  cz FS: Město nemá konce.
  EN TP: kids in the countryside
  cz TP: děti na venkově
  EN FP: kids leaving the countryside
  cz FP: děti odcházející z venkova
2308 | viking (noun): a warrior sailor from old Scandinavia | loc: viking
  EN TS: The viking is holding a blade.
  cz TS: Viking drží čepel.
  EN FS: The viking is holding an axe.
  cz FS: Viking drží sekeru.
  EN TP: a viking in fur
  cz TP: viking v kožešině
  EN FP: a viking on a ship
  cz FP: viking na lodi
2310 | melody (noun): a line of musical notes that makes a tune | loc: melodie
  EN TS: A melody rises from the piano.
  cz TS: Z klavíru stoupá melodie.
  EN FS: A melody rises from the drum.
  cz FS: Z bubnu stoupá melodie.
  EN TP: a golden melody rising
  cz TP: stoupající zlatá melodie
  EN FP: a golden melody falling
  cz FP: klesající zlatá melodie
2311 | stained glass (noun): coloured glass pieces forming a picture | loc: vitráž
  EN TS: The stained glass is huge.
  cz TS: Vitráž je obrovská.
  EN FS: The stained glass is tiny.
  cz FS: Vitráž je maličká.
  EN TP: tall stained glass windows
  cz TP: vysoká okna s vitrážemi
  EN FP: a stained glass lamp
  cz FP: lampa s vitráží
2312 | race car (noun): a very fast car built for racing on a track | loc: závodní auto
  EN TS: A race car by the palm trees.
  cz TS: Závodní auto u palem.
  EN FS: A race car by the pine trees.
  cz FS: Závodní auto u borovic.
  EN TP: a red race car
  cz TP: červené závodní auto
  EN FP: a red race horse
  cz FP: červený dostihový kůň
2313 | camper van (noun): a van you can travel and sleep in | loc: obytná dodávka
  EN TS: Home is where the camper van is.
  cz TS: Domov je tam, kde je obytná dodávka.
  EN FS: Home is where the orange tent is.
  cz FS: Domov je tam, kde je oranžový stan.
  EN TP: an orange camper van
  cz TP: oranžová obytná dodávka
  EN FP: a camper van in town
  cz FP: obytná dodávka ve městě
2314 | ghost (noun): the spirit of a dead person | loc: duch
  EN TS: The ghost's costume: one old sheet.
  cz TS: Kostým ducha: jedno staré prostěradlo.
  EN FS: The ghost's costume: one old towel.
  cz FS: Kostým ducha: jeden starý ručník.
  EN TP: a white sheet ghost
  cz TP: duch z bílého prostěradla
  EN FP: a ghost in a castle
  cz FP: duch na hradě
2315 | landscape (noun): a wide view of natural scenery | loc: krajina
  EN TS: This landscape is paper!
  cz TS: Tahle krajina je z papíru!
  EN FS: This landscape is glass!
  cz FS: Tahle krajina je ze skla!
  EN TP: a paper landscape
  cz TP: papírová krajina
  EN FP: a landscape photo
  cz FP: fotka krajiny
2317 | hood (noun): the part of a coat that covers your head | loc: kapuce
  EN TS: Her red hood is up.
  cz TS: Má nasazenou červenou kapuci.
  EN FS: Her red hood is down.
  cz FS: Má sundanou červenou kapuci.
  EN TP: a red hood pulled up
  cz TP: nasazená červená kapuce
  EN FP: the hood of a car
  cz FP: kapota auta
2318 | sword (noun): a long metal blade with a handle for fighting | loc: meč
  EN TS: She has a very long sword.
  cz TS: Má hodně dlouhý meč.
  EN FS: She has a very long spear.
  cz FS: Má hodně dlouhé kopí.
  EN TP: a long curved sword
  cz TP: dlouhý zahnutý meč
  EN FP: a long straight sword
  cz FP: dlouhý rovný meč
2322 | broken (adjective): cracked or in pieces, no longer whole | loc: rozbitý
  EN TS: The glass is broken!
  cz TS: Sklo je rozbité!
  EN FS: The clock is broken!
  cz FS: Hodiny jsou rozbité!
  EN TP: a broken mirror portrait
  cz TP: portrét v rozbitém zrcadle
  EN FP: a broken arm in plaster
  cz FP: zlomená ruka v sádře
2324 | sing (verb): to make music with your voice by singing | loc: zpívat
  EN TS: He is singing like a star!
  cz TS: Zpívá jako hvězda!
  EN FS: He is dancing like a star!
  cz FS: Tančí jako hvězda!
  EN TP: singing into a microphone
  cz TP: zpívání do mikrofonu
  EN FP: singing in the shower
  cz FP: zpívání ve sprše
2326 | prince (noun): the son of a king or queen | loc: princ
  EN TS: The prince has cool blue hair.
  cz TS: Princ má cool modré vlasy.
  EN FS: The prince has cool pink hair.
  cz FS: Princ má cool růžové vlasy.
  EN TP: a prince with a crown
  cz TP: princ s korunou
  EN FP: a prince on a horse
  cz FP: princ na koni
2327 | palm tree (noun): a tall tree with no branches and big top leaves | loc: palma
  EN TS: This car and the palm trees look so cool.
  cz TS: To auto a ty palmy vypadají fakt cool.
  EN FS: This bike and the palm trees look so cool.
  cz FS: To kolo a ty palmy vypadají fakt cool.
  EN TP: palm trees at sunset
  cz TP: palmy při západu slunce
  EN FP: palm trees on an island
  cz FP: palmy na ostrově
2328 | throne (noun): the decorated chair of a king or queen | loc: trůn
  EN TS: Such a "humble" throne!
  cz TS: Takový „skromný“ trůn!
  EN FS: Such a "humble" bed!
  cz FS: Taková „skromná“ postel!
  EN TP: a huge golden throne
  cz TP: obrovský zlatý trůn
  EN FP: an empty golden throne
  cz FP: prázdný zlatý trůn
2330 | give (verb): to cause someone to have something | loc: dát
  EN TS: She wants to give you flowers.
  cz TS: Chce ti dát květiny.
  EN FS: She wants to give you a cake.
  cz FS: Chce ti dát dort.
  EN TP: giving three yellow flowers
  cz TP: dávat tři žluté květiny
  EN FP: giving red roses
  cz FP: dávat rudé růže
2333 | in love (phrase): having strong romantic feelings for someone | loc: zamilovaný
  EN TS: They are so in love!
  cz TS: Jsou tak zamilovaní!
  EN FS: They are so angry!
  cz FS: Jsou tak naštvaní!
  EN TP: in love under autumn leaves
  cz TP: zamilovaní pod podzimním listím
  EN FP: in love on a beach
  cz FP: zamilovaní na pláži
2340 | strange (adjective): unusual and hard to understand | loc: zvláštní
  EN TS: This house is a bit strange.
  cz TS: Tenhle dům je trochu zvláštní.
  EN FS: This car is a bit strange.
  cz FS: Tohle auto je trochu zvláštní.
  EN TP: a strange tall house
  cz TP: zvláštní vysoký dům
  EN FP: a strange old boat
  cz FP: zvláštní stará loď
2341 | death (noun): the end of a living thing's life | loc: smrt
  EN TS: Flowers make death look pretty.
  cz TS: Díky květinám vypadá smrt hezky.
  EN FS: Candles make death look pretty.
  cz FS: Díky svíčkám vypadá smrt hezky.
  EN TP: death among flowers
  cz TP: smrt mezi květinami
  EN FP: death in a car crash
  cz FP: smrt při autonehodě
2344 | crooked (adjective): bent and leaning, not straight | loc: křivý
  EN TS: The houses are a bit crooked.
  cz TS: Domy jsou trochu křivé.
  EN FS: The trees are a bit crooked.
  cz FS: Stromy jsou trochu křivé.
  EN TP: tall crooked houses
  cz TP: vysoké křivé domy
  EN FP: a crooked picture frame
  cz FP: křivý rámeček obrazu
2345 | wizard (noun): a man in stories who can do magic | loc: čaroděj
  EN TS: What a long wizard beard!
  cz TS: Ten čaroděj má ale dlouhé vousy!
  EN FS: What a short wizard beard!
  cz FS: Ten čaroděj má ale krátké vousy!
  EN TP: an old wizard in grey
  cz TP: starý čaroděj v šedém
  EN FP: an old wizard in red
  cz FP: starý čaroděj v červeném
2347 | explore (verb): to travel through a new place to see it | loc: prozkoumat
  EN TS: He is exploring an exoplanet.
  cz TS: Prozkoumává exoplanetu.
  EN FS: He is exploring a deep cave.
  cz FS: Prozkoumává hlubokou jeskyni.
  EN TP: exploring an alien world
  cz TP: prozkoumávání cizího světa
  EN FP: exploring an old castle
  cz FP: prozkoumávání starého hradu
2349 | dress up (phrase): to put on a costume to look like someone else | loc: převléct se do kostýmu
  EN TS: Even the cat dressed up!
  cz TS: Dokonce i kočka se převlékla do kostýmu!
  EN FS: Even the dog dressed up!
  cz FS: Dokonce i pes se převlékl do kostýmu!
  EN TP: dressed up as witches
  cz TP: převlečení za čarodějnice
  EN FP: dressed up as pirates
  cz FP: převlečení za piráty
2350 | carve (verb): to cut a shape into something hard | loc: vyřezávat
  EN TS: Somebody carved faces! Wow!
  cz TS: Někdo vyřezal obličeje! Páni!
  EN FS: Somebody carved names! Wow!
  cz FS: Někdo vyřezal jména! Páni!
  EN TP: carved pumpkin faces
  cz TP: vyřezané obličeje v dýních
  EN FP: carved wooden faces
  cz FP: vyřezávané dřevěné obličeje
2351 | drive (verb): to operate or control a vehicle | loc: řídit
  EN TS: Someone is driving a green car.
  cz TS: Někdo řídí zelené auto.
  EN FS: Someone is driving a yellow car.
  cz FS: Někdo řídí žluté auto.
  EN TP: to drive through autumn
  cz TP: řídit podzimní krajinou
  EN FP: to drive through the snow
  cz FP: řídit sněhem
2353 | giant (adjective): far bigger than normal for its kind | loc: obrovský
  EN TS: The mushrooms are giant, bro.
  cz TS: Ty houby jsou obrovské, kámo.
  EN FS: The mushrooms are tiny, bro.
  cz FS: Ty houby jsou maličké, kámo.
  EN TP: giant pink mushrooms
  cz TP: obrovské růžové houby
  EN FP: giant pink flowers
  cz FP: obrovské růžové květiny
2354 | headdress (noun): a decorated head covering for ceremonies | loc: slavnostní pokrývka hlavy
  EN TS: A huge golden headdress!
  cz TS: Obrovská zlatá slavnostní pokrývka hlavy!
  EN FS: A huge silver headdress!
  cz FS: Obrovská stříbrná slavnostní pokrývka hlavy!
  EN TP: a huge golden headdress
  cz TP: zlatá slavnostní pokrývka hlavy
  EN FP: taking off a headdress
  cz FP: sundávání pokrývky hlavy
2356 | toward (preposition): in the direction of something | loc: k
  EN TS: The road leads toward a planet.
  cz TS: Cesta vede k planetě.
  EN FS: The road leads toward a castle.
  cz FS: Cesta vede k hradu.
  EN TP: toward a huge planet
  cz TP: k obrovské planetě
  EN FP: toward a huge city
  cz FP: k obrovskému městu
2357 | black and white (phrase): with no colors, only dark and light shades | loc: černobílý
  EN TS: The house is black and white.
  cz TS: Dům je černobílý.
  EN FS: The house is red and white.
  cz FS: Dům je červenobílý.
  EN TP: a black and white drawing
  cz TP: černobílá kresba
  EN FP: a black and white film
  cz FP: černobílý film
2358 | farm (noun): land where people grow food and keep animals | loc: farma
  EN TS: The farm has red roofs.
  cz TS: Farma má červené střechy.
  EN FS: The farm has blue roofs.
  cz FS: Farma má modré střechy.
  EN TP: a farm on a hillside
  cz TP: farma na svahu
  EN FP: a farm with cows
  cz FP: farma s kravami
2359 | traditional (adjective): done or worn as it was long ago | loc: tradiční
  EN TS: They wear traditional dress.
  cz TS: Mají na sobě tradiční oděv.
  EN FS: They wear modern dress.
  cz FS: Mají na sobě moderní oděv.
  EN TP: traditional Indian dress
  cz TP: tradiční indický oděv
  EN FP: a traditional wedding cake
  cz FP: tradiční svatební dort
2360 | fast (adjective): moving or able to move very quickly | loc: rychlý
  EN TS: That red car looks crazy fast.
  cz TS: To červené auto vypadá šíleně rychle.
  EN FS: That red van looks crazy fast.
  cz FS: Ta červená dodávka vypadá šíleně rychle.
  EN TP: a fast red car
  cz TP: rychlé červené auto
  EN FP: a fast red boat
  cz FP: rychlý červený člun
2363 | mysterious (adjective): strange and hard to explain | loc: záhadný
  EN TS: She's turning into mysterious smoke.
  cz TS: Mění se v záhadný kouř.
  EN FS: She's turning into mysterious water.
  cz FS: Mění se v záhadnou vodu.
  EN TP: a mysterious smoky woman
  cz TP: záhadná žena z kouře
  EN FP: a mysterious locked door
  cz FP: záhadné zamčené dveře
2364 | bull (noun): a large male animal of the cow family | loc: býk
  EN TS: A white bull is behind him.
  cz TS: Za ním je bílý býk.
  EN FS: A white horse is behind him.
  cz FS: Za ním je bílý kůň.
  EN TP: a bull with curved horns
  cz TP: býk se zahnutými rohy
  EN FP: a bull in a ring
  cz FP: býk v aréně
2365 | metal (noun): a hard shiny material like iron or steel | loc: kov
  EN TS: His metal suit is so shiny.
  cz TS: Jeho oblek z kovu je tak lesklý.
  EN FS: His metal suit is so dirty.
  cz FS: Jeho oblek z kovu je tak špinavý.
  EN TP: a red metal suit
  cz TP: červený oblek z kovu
  EN FP: a red metal car
  cz FP: červené kovové auto
2367 | dirty (adjective): covered with dirt or grime | loc: špinavý
  EN TS: This car is a little dirty.
  cz TS: Tohle auto je trošku špinavé.
  EN FS: This bus is a little dirty.
  cz FS: Tenhle autobus je trošku špinavý.
  EN TP: an old dirty sports car
  cz TP: staré špinavé sportovní auto
  EN FP: a dirty old bus
  cz FP: špinavý starý autobus
2368 | paradise (noun): a perfect place where all is wonderful | loc: ráj
  EN TS: This beach is total paradise.
  cz TS: Tahle pláž je totální ráj.
  EN FS: This desert is total paradise.
  cz FS: Tahle poušť je totální ráj.
  EN TP: a tropical paradise at sunset
  cz TP: tropický ráj při západu slunce
  EN FP: a paradise for skiers
  cz FP: ráj pro lyžaře
2371 | sorrow (noun): deep sadness, especially about a loss | loc: žal
  EN TS: The angel is lost in sorrow.
  cz TS: Anděl je celý pohlcený žalem.
  EN FS: The angel is lost in a book.
  cz FS: Anděl je celý pohlcený knihou.
  EN TP: an angel full of sorrow
  cz TP: anděl plný žalu
  EN FP: an angel full of joy
  cz FP: anděl plný radosti
2372 | exhausted (adjective): extremely tired with no energy left | loc: vyčerpaný
  EN TS: He looks totally exhausted.
  cz TS: Vypadá totálně vyčerpaně.
  EN FS: He looks totally excited.
  cz FS: Vypadá totálně nadšeně.
  EN TP: an exhausted worker
  cz TP: vyčerpaný dělník
  EN FP: an exhausted phone battery
  cz FP: vybitá baterka mobilu
2373 | universe (noun): all of space with its stars and planets | loc: vesmír
  EN TS: The universe looks crowded.
  cz TS: Vesmír vypadá přeplněně.
  EN FS: The universe looks empty.
  cz FS: Vesmír vypadá prázdně.
  EN TP: a universe full of planets
  cz TP: vesmír plný planet
  EN FP: a universe without stars
  cz FP: vesmír bez hvězd
2375 | half (noun): one of two equal parts of something | loc: polovina
  EN TS: Half grey, half yellow. It cannot decide.
  cz TS: Polovina šedá, polovina žlutá. Nemůže se rozhodnout.
  EN FS: Half grey, half green. It cannot decide.
  cz FS: Polovina šedá, polovina zelená. Nemůže se rozhodnout.
  EN TP: half a yellow car
  cz TP: polovina žlutého auta
  EN FP: half a yellow bus
  cz FP: polovina žlutého autobusu
2378 | relax (verb): to calm down and let your body feel loose | loc: relaxovat
  EN TS: She is totally relaxing now.
  cz TS: Teď naplno relaxuje.
  EN FS: She is totally running now.
  cz FS: Teď naplno běží.
  EN TP: relaxing under the moon
  cz TP: relaxování pod měsícem
  EN FP: relaxing on the beach
  cz FP: relaxování na pláži
2379 | fall (verb): to descend freely under gravity | loc: padat
  EN TS: Red leaves are falling.
  cz TS: Padá červené listí.
  EN FS: Red apples are falling.
  cz FS: Padají červená jablka.
  EN TP: leaves falling in the rain
  cz TP: listí padající v dešti
  EN FP: snow falling on cars
  cz FP: sníh padající na auta
2380 | escape (verb): to get away from danger | loc: uniknout | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The car is escaping the fire!
  cz TS: Auto uniká před ohněm!
  EN FS: The car is escaping the flood!
  cz FS: Auto uniká před povodní!
  EN TP: escaping a burning forest
  cz TP: únik z hořícího lesa
  EN FP: escaping a burning house
  cz FP: únik z hořícího domu
2381 | claws (noun): the sharp curved nails on an animal's feet | loc: drápy
  EN TS: Those claws are really sharp!
  cz TS: Ty drápy jsou fakt ostré!
  EN FS: Those teeth are really sharp!
  cz FS: Ty zuby jsou fakt ostré!
  EN TP: claws on a branch
  cz TP: drápy na větvi
  EN FP: claws on a cat
  cz FP: drápy kočky
2382 | scales (noun): the hard shiny plates on a fish's skin | loc: šupiny
  EN TS: Look, her tail has blue scales.
  cz TS: Koukej, její ocas má modré šupiny.
  EN FS: Look, her tail has pink scales.
  cz FS: Koukej, její ocas má růžové šupiny.
  EN TP: a tail with blue scales
  cz TP: ocas s modrými šupinami
  EN FP: weighing on the scales
  cz FP: vážení na váze
2383 | gem (noun): a beautiful precious stone used in jewellery | loc: drahokam
  EN TS: Fire and gems everywhere!
  cz TS: Všude oheň a drahokamy!
  EN FS: Ice and gems everywhere!
  cz FS: Všude led a drahokamy!
  EN TP: sparkling colorful gems
  cz TP: třpytivé barevné drahokamy
  EN FP: gems in a dark cave
  cz FP: drahokamy v temné jeskyni
2384 | kingdom (noun): a land that a king or queen rules | loc: království
  EN TS: A tiny kingdom on a hill.
  cz TS: Malinké království na kopci.
  EN FS: A tiny kingdom on an island.
  cz FS: Malinké království na ostrově.
  EN TP: a storybook kingdom
  cz TP: pohádkové království
  EN FP: the animal kingdom
  cz FP: říše zvířat
2385 | alien (adjective): coming from another planet, not from Earth | loc: mimozemský
  EN TS: A purple alien landscape.
  cz TS: Fialová mimozemská krajina.
  EN FS: A green alien landscape.
  cz FS: Zelená mimozemská krajina.
  EN TP: a purple alien world
  cz TP: fialový mimozemský svět
  EN FP: an alien in a spaceship
  cz FP: mimozemšťan ve vesmírné lodi
2386 | railing (noun): a fence of bars you hold onto | loc: zábradlí
  EN TS: The railing faces the sunset.
  cz TS: Zábradlí míří k západu slunce.
  EN FS: The railing faces a mountain.
  cz FS: Zábradlí míří k hoře.
  EN TP: a metal balcony railing
  cz TP: kovové zábradlí balkonu
  EN FP: a railing on a staircase
  cz FP: zábradlí na schodišti
2387 | twisted (adjective): bent and turned in many directions | loc: pokroucený
  EN TS: The tree is twisted. Cool.
  cz TS: Strom je pokroucený. Hustý.
  EN FS: The tree is straight. Cool.
  cz FS: Strom je rovný. Hustý.
  EN TP: a twisted old tree
  cz TP: pokroucený starý strom
  EN FP: a twisted metal fence
  cz FP: pokroucený kovový plot
2388 | gamer (noun): a person who plays video games a lot | loc: gamer
  EN TS: This gamer loves pink.
  cz TS: Tenhle gamer miluje růžovou.
  EN FS: This gamer loves green.
  cz FS: Tenhle gamer miluje zelenou.
  EN TP: a gamer in pink
  cz TP: gamer v růžovém
  EN FP: a gamer in blue
  cz FP: gamer v modrém
2389 | faith (noun): a strong belief in God or a religion | loc: víra
  EN TS: She is praying with faith.
  cz TS: Modlí se s vírou.
  EN FS: She is praying with open arms.
  cz FS: Modlí se s rozpřaženýma rukama.
  EN TP: praying with deep faith
  cz TP: modlitba s hlubokou vírou
  EN FP: losing her faith
  cz FP: ztráta víry
2390 | stylish (adjective): dressed in a fashionable, attractive way | loc: stylový
  EN TS: So stylish on a beach!
  cz TS: Stylový look na pláži!
  EN FS: So stylish on a ship!
  cz FS: Stylový look na lodi!
  EN TP: a stylish beach look
  cz TP: stylový plážový look
  EN FP: a stylish winter coat
  cz FP: stylový zimní kabát
2391 | scenery (noun): the beautiful natural landscape around you | loc: scenérie
  EN TS: Epic scenery, red sky.
  cz TS: Epická scenérie, rudé nebe.
  EN FS: Epic scenery, blue sky.
  cz FS: Epická scenérie, modré nebe.
  EN TP: scenery with a huge moon
  cz TP: scenérie s obřím měsícem
  EN FP: scenery for a school play
  cz FP: scenérie školního divadla
2392 | stroll (noun): a slow, relaxed walk for pleasure | loc: procházka
  EN TS: A stroll in a straw hat? Stylish.
  cz TS: Procházka ve slaměném klobouku? Stylové.
  EN FS: A stroll in a red hat? Stylish.
  cz FS: Procházka v červeném klobouku? Stylové.
  EN TP: a stroll among flowers
  cz TP: procházka mezi květinami
  EN FP: a stroll on the beach
  cz FP: procházka po pláži
2393 | high heels (noun): shoes with a tall thin part under the back | loc: boty na vysokém podpatku
  EN TS: Office look with high heels.
  cz TS: Kancelářský look s botami na vysokém podpatku.
  EN FS: Office look with trainers.
  cz FS: Kancelářský look s teniskami.
  EN TP: black strappy high heels
  cz TP: černé páskové boty na podpatku
  EN FP: high heels in a box
  cz FP: podpatky v krabici
2394 | choose (verb): to pick one thing from several choices | loc: vybrat si
  EN TS: He has to choose a road.
  cz TS: Musí si vybrat cestu.
  EN FS: He has to choose a boat.
  cz FS: Musí si vybrat loď.
  EN TP: choosing the right road
  cz TP: výběr správné cesty
  EN FP: choosing the right dress
  cz FP: výběr správných šatů
2395 | vest (noun): clothing without sleeves worn over a shirt | loc: vesta
  EN TS: His vest has gold buttons.
  cz TS: Jeho vesta má zlaté knoflíky.
  EN FS: His vest has silver buttons.
  cz FS: Jeho vesta má stříbrné knoflíky.
  EN TP: a black leather vest
  cz TP: černá kožená vesta
  EN FP: a vest under a jacket
  cz FP: vesta pod sakem
2396 | corset (noun): a tight laced top that shapes the waist | loc: korzet
  EN TS: That laced corset is stunning.
  cz TS: Ten šněrovaný korzet je úchvatný.
  EN FS: That laced glove is stunning.
  cz FS: Ta šněrovaná rukavice je úchvatná.
  EN TP: a laced corset
  cz TP: šněrovaný korzet
  EN FP: laced boots
  cz FP: šněrovací boty
2397 | gloomy (adjective): dark and sad, without light or cheer | loc: ponurý
  EN TS: This room is so gloomy!
  cz TS: Tenhle pokoj je tak ponurý!
  EN FS: This room is so sunny!
  cz FS: Tenhle pokoj je tak slunný!
  EN TP: a gloomy gothic room
  cz TP: ponurý gotický pokoj
  EN FP: a gloomy rainy day
  cz FP: ponurý deštivý den
2398 | terrace (noun): an open paved area outside a building | loc: terasa
  EN TS: The terrace offers sea views.
  cz TS: Terasa nabízí výhled na moře.
  EN FS: The terrace offers city views.
  cz FS: Terasa nabízí výhled na město.
  EN TP: a tiled seaside terrace
  cz TP: dlážděná terasa u moře
  EN FP: a terrace in the mountains
  cz FP: terasa v horách
2400 | fierce (adjective): violent, angry and frightening to look at | loc: zuřivý
  EN TS: That's one fierce viking!
  cz TS: To je ale zuřivý viking!
  EN FS: That's one fierce pirate!
  cz FS: To je ale zuřivý pirát!
  EN TP: a fierce angry stare
  cz TP: zuřivý rozzlobený pohled
  EN FP: a fierce storm at sea
  cz FP: zuřivá bouře na moři
2401 | fantasy (noun): an imagined magical world, not real life | loc: fantazie
  EN TS: A path into a fantasy world.
  cz TS: Cesta do světa fantazie.
  EN FS: A path into a busy city.
  cz FS: Cesta do rušného města.
  EN TP: a fantasy forest path
  cz TP: lesní cesta ve světě fantazie
  EN FP: a fantasy book cover
  cz FP: obálka fantasy knihy
2404 | lotus (noun): a large white water flower with many petals | loc: lotos
  EN TS: This lotus has an orange centre.
  cz TS: Tenhle lotos má oranžový střed.
  EN FS: This lotus has a purple centre.
  cz FS: Tenhle lotos má fialový střed.
  EN TP: a white lotus flower
  cz TP: bílý květ lotosu
  EN FP: a lotus yoga pose
  cz FP: jógová pozice lotosu
2406 | jeep (noun): a strong car for driving on rough roads | loc: džíp
  EN TS: One jeep, too many bags!
  cz TS: Jeden džíp, příliš mnoho tašek!
  EN FS: One bike, too many bags!
  cz FS: Jedno kolo, příliš mnoho tašek!
  EN TP: a jeep full of bags
  cz TP: džíp plný tašek
  EN FP: a jeep in the city
  cz FP: džíp ve městě
2408 | imagination (noun): the mind's power to create unreal worlds | loc: představivost
  EN TS: Imagination opens a real path.
  cz TS: Představivost otevírá skutečnou cestu.
  EN FS: Imagination opens a real door.
  cz FS: Představivost otevírá skutečné dveře.
  EN TP: a book of imagination
  cz TP: kniha představivosti
  EN FP: no imagination at all
  cz FP: žádná představivost
2411 | ornate (adjective): covered in rich, detailed patterns | loc: zdobný
  EN TS: That crown is so ornate!
  cz TS: Ta koruna je tak zdobná!
  EN FS: That mask is so ornate!
  cz FS: Ta maska je tak zdobná!
  EN TP: an ornate golden crown
  cz TP: zdobná zlatá koruna
  EN FP: an ornate wooden door
  cz FP: zdobné dřevěné dveře
2412 | arm in arm (phrase): walking with your arm linked through another's | loc: zavěšení do sebe
  EN TS: They are walking arm in arm.
  cz TS: Jdou zavěšení do sebe.
  EN FS: They are running arm in arm.
  cz FS: Běží zavěšení do sebe.
  EN TP: walking arm in arm
  cz TP: jdou zavěšení do sebe
  EN FP: sitting arm in arm
  cz FP: sedí zavěšení do sebe
2413 | cub (noun): the baby of a wild animal like a wolf | loc: mládě
  EN TS: She is hugging a wolf cub!
  cz TS: Objímá vlčí mládě!
  EN FS: She is hugging a bear cub!
  cz FS: Objímá medvědí mládě!
  EN TP: hugging a wolf cub
  cz TP: objímání vlčího mláděte
  EN FP: hugging a big wolf
  cz FP: objímání velkého vlka
2415 | garland (noun): a chain of flowers worn or hung as decoration | loc: girlanda
  EN TS: The god wears flower garlands.
  cz TS: Bůh nosí girlandy z květin.
  EN FS: The god wears paper garlands.
  cz FS: Bůh nosí girlandy z papíru.
  EN TP: garlands of red flowers
  cz TP: girlandy z červených květů
  EN FP: garlands on a Christmas tree
  cz FP: girlandy na vánočním stromku
2417 | harmony (noun): a state where opposites fit together calmly | loc: harmonie
  EN TS: Dark and light in harmony.
  cz TS: Tma a světlo v harmonii.
  EN FS: Red and blue in harmony.
  cz FS: Červená a modrá v harmonii.
  EN TP: a sphere of harmony
  cz TP: koule harmonie
  EN FP: singing in harmony
  cz FP: zpívání v harmonii
2418 | songbird (noun): a small bird known for its singing | loc: zpěvný pták
  EN TS: I think it's a songbird.
  cz TS: Myslím, že je to zpěvný pták.
  EN FS: I think it's a pigeon.
  cz FS: Myslím, že je to holub.
  EN TP: a songbird on a branch
  cz TP: zpěvný pták na větvi
  EN FP: a songbird on a roof
  cz FP: zpěvný pták na střeše
2420 | rickety (adjective): old, weak and likely to fall apart | loc: rozviklaný
  EN TS: This rickety tower is "safe".
  cz TS: Tahle rozviklaná věž je „bezpečná“.
  EN FS: This rickety bridge is "safe".
  cz FS: Tenhle rozviklaný most je „bezpečný“.
  EN TP: a rickety tower of houses
  cz TP: rozviklaná věž z domů
  EN FP: a rickety old chair
  cz FP: rozviklaná stará židle
2421 | fungus (noun): a mushroom-like thing that grows in damp places | loc: houba
  EN TS: This fungus is big. Really big.
  cz TS: Tahle houba je velká. Fakt velká.
  EN FS: This fungus is small. Really small.
  cz FS: Tahle houba je malá. Fakt malá.
  EN TP: giant pale fungus
  cz TP: obří bledá houba
  EN FP: fungus on old bread
  cz FP: plíseň na starém chlebu
2422 | overalls (noun): trousers with straps over the shoulders | loc: laclové kalhoty
  EN TS: She is reading in overalls.
  cz TS: Čte si v laclových kalhotách.
  EN FS: She is sleeping in overalls.
  cz FS: Spí v laclových kalhotách.
  EN TP: blue denim overalls
  cz TP: modré džínové laclové kalhoty
  EN FP: overalls covered in paint
  cz FP: laclové kalhoty od barvy
2424 | cypress (noun): a tall narrow dark-green tree | loc: cypřiš
  EN TS: Cypresses grow on the left.
  cz TS: Vlevo rostou cypřiše.
  EN FS: Cypresses grow on the right.
  cz FS: Vpravo rostou cypřiše.
  EN TP: a row of cypress trees
  cz TP: řada cypřišů
  EN FP: a cypress in a pot
  cz FP: cypřiš v květináči
2425 | frame (noun): a decorated border that surrounds a picture | loc: rám
  EN TS: A black cat in a spooky frame!
  cz TS: Černá kočka ve strašidelném rámu!
  EN FS: A white cat in a spooky frame!
  cz FS: Bílá kočka ve strašidelném rámu!
  EN TP: a frame with black roses
  cz TP: rám s černými růžemi
  EN FP: a frame for a bicycle
  cz FP: rám jízdního kola
2428 | monitor (noun): the screen you look at on a computer | loc: monitor
  EN TS: Three monitors, maximum focus.
  cz TS: Tři monitory, maximální soustředění.
  EN FS: Two monitors, maximum focus.
  cz FS: Dva monitory, maximální soustředění.
  EN TP: three large monitors
  cz TP: tři velké monitory
  EN FP: a baby monitor
  cz FP: dětská chůvička
2429 | stag (noun): an adult male deer with large antlers | loc: jelen
  EN TS: Yo, the stag is in a stream.
  cz TS: Hele, jelen je v potoce.
  EN FS: Yo, the stag is in a field.
  cz FS: Hele, jelen je na louce.
  EN TP: a stag in a stream
  cz TP: jelen v potoce
  EN FP: a stag in the snow
  cz FP: jelen ve sněhu
2430 | flow (verb): to move along smoothly like water | loc: téct | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The river flows past rocks.
  cz TS: Řeka teče kolem skal.
  EN FS: The river flows past houses.
  cz FS: Řeka teče kolem domů.
  EN TP: a river flowing through rocks
  cz TP: řeka tekoucí mezi skalami
  EN FP: a river flowing through town
  cz FP: řeka tekoucí městem
2432 | flamenco (noun): a fiery Spanish dance with fans and stamping | loc: flamenco
  EN TS: Her flamenco pose is fire!
  cz TS: Její póza z flamenca je pecka!
  EN FS: Her ballet pose is fire!
  cz FS: Její póza z baletu je pecka!
  EN TP: flamenco with a fan
  cz TP: flamenco s vějířem
  EN FP: flamenco on a stage
  cz FP: flamenco na pódiu
2433 | gallop (verb): how a horse runs at its fastest speed | loc: cválat
  EN TS: The horse is galloping at us!
  cz TS: Kůň na nás cválá!
  EN FS: The donkey is galloping at us!
  cz FS: Osel na nás cválá!
  EN TP: a galloping white horse
  cz TP: cválající bílý kůň
  EN FP: a galloping black horse
  cz FP: cválající černý kůň
2434 | still life (noun): a painting of arranged objects like flowers | loc: zátiší
  EN TS: The still life shows blossoms.
  cz TS: Zátiší zobrazuje květy.
  EN FS: The still life shows oranges.
  cz FS: Zátiší zobrazuje pomeranče.
  EN TP: a still life with blossoms
  cz TP: zátiší s květy
  EN FP: a still life with fruit
  cz FP: zátiší s ovocem
2435 | pebble (noun): a small smooth round stone | loc: oblázek
  EN TS: The stream is full of pebbles.
  cz TS: Potok je plný oblázků.
  EN FS: The stream is full of fish.
  cz FS: Potok je plný ryb.
  EN TP: smooth round pebbles
  cz TP: hladké kulaté oblázky
  EN FP: pebbles on a beach
  cz FP: oblázky na pláži
2439 | wet (adjective): covered or soaked with water | loc: mokrý
  EN TS: The street is wet at night.
  cz TS: Ulice je v noci mokrá.
  EN FS: The street is dry at night.
  cz FS: Ulice je v noci suchá.
  EN TP: a wet night street
  cz TP: mokrá noční ulice
  EN FP: a wet sandy beach
  cz FP: mokrá písečná pláž
2440 | electricity (noun): the energy made by moving electrons | loc: elektřina
  EN TS: The electricity is everywhere!
  cz TS: Elektřina je všude!
  EN FS: The water is everywhere!
  cz FS: Voda je všude!
  EN TP: sparks of electricity
  cz TP: jiskry elektřiny
  EN FP: an electricity bill
  cz FP: účet za elektřinu
2446 | shoelaces (noun): strings that tie your shoes or boots closed | loc: tkaničky
  EN TS: Big bows, long shoelaces!
  cz TS: Velké mašle, dlouhé tkaničky!
  EN FS: Big bows, short shoelaces!
  cz FS: Velké mašle, krátké tkaničky!
  EN TP: long yellow shoelaces
  cz TP: dlouhé žluté tkaničky
  EN FP: broken yellow shoelaces
  cz FP: roztrhané žluté tkaničky
2449 | shop window (noun): a big glass front where a store shows its goods | loc: výloha
  EN TS: Just a "few" glowing shop windows.
  cz TS: Jen „pár“ zářících výloh.
  EN FS: Just a "few" dark shop windows.
  cz FS: Jen „pár“ tmavých výloh.
  EN TP: glowing shop windows
  cz TP: zářící výlohy
  EN FP: a broken shop window
  cz FP: rozbitá výloha
2450 | thunderstorm (noun): a storm with lightning and loud rumbling | loc: bouřka
  EN TS: A thunderstorm over the water.
  cz TS: Bouřka nad vodou.
  EN FS: A thunderstorm over the city.
  cz FS: Bouřka nad městem.
  EN TP: a thunderstorm over water
  cz TP: bouřka nad vodou
  EN FP: a thunderstorm over a town
  cz FP: bouřka nad městečkem
2451 | eiffel tower (noun): the famous tall iron landmark in Paris | loc: Eiffelova věž
  EN TS: A bird near the Eiffel Tower.
  cz TS: Pták u Eiffelovy věže.
  EN FS: A plane near the Eiffel Tower.
  cz FS: Letadlo u Eiffelovy věže.
  EN TP: the riverside Eiffel Tower
  cz TP: Eiffelova věž u řeky
  EN FP: the Eiffel Tower in snow
  cz FP: Eiffelova věž ve sněhu
2452 | romantic (adjective): connected with love, making you feel love | loc: romantický
  EN TS: The snowy walk is romantic!
  cz TS: Ta procházka ve sněhu je romantická!
  EN FS: The rainy walk is romantic!
  cz FS: Ta procházka v dešti je romantická!
  EN TP: a romantic snowy walk
  cz TP: romantická procházka ve sněhu
  EN FP: a romantic candle dinner
  cz FP: romantická večeře při svíčkách
2454 | winding (adjective): curving and turning again and again | loc: klikatý
  EN TS: The winding path has lanterns.
  cz TS: Na klikaté cestě jsou lucerny.
  EN FS: The straight path has lamps.
  cz FS: Na rovné cestě jsou lampy.
  EN TP: a winding cobblestone path
  cz TP: klikatá dlážděná cesta
  EN FP: a winding mountain river
  cz FP: klikatá horská řeka
2455 | shorts (noun): trousers that end above the knee | loc: šortky
  EN TS: She wears green shorts.
  cz TS: Má na sobě zelené šortky.
  EN FS: She wears green trousers.
  cz FS: Má na sobě zelené kalhoty.
  EN TP: green denim shorts
  cz TP: zelené džínové šortky
  EN FP: green swimming shorts
  cz FP: zelené plavecké šortky
2457 | nurse (noun): a person who cares for sick people in a hospital | loc: zdravotní sestra
  EN TS: The nurse has a stethoscope.
  cz TS: Zdravotní sestra má stetoskop.
  EN FS: The nurse has a clipboard.
  cz FS: Zdravotní sestra má psací desky.
  EN TP: a nurse in uniform
  cz TP: zdravotní sestra v uniformě
  EN FP: a nurse with a baby
  cz FP: zdravotní sestra s miminkem
2458 | farmhouse (noun): the main house on a farm, where the farmer lives | loc: statek
  EN TS: A farmhouse with lit windows.
  cz TS: Statek s rozsvícenými okny.
  EN FS: A farmhouse with dark windows.
  cz FS: Statek s tmavými okny.
  EN TP: a farmhouse at sunset
  cz TP: statek při západu slunce
  EN FP: a farmhouse by the sea
  cz FP: statek u moře
2460 | wildflowers (noun): flowers that grow by themselves in fields | loc: polní květiny
  EN TS: Wildflowers in a blue pot, cute.
  cz TS: Polní květiny v modrém květináči, jak roztomilé.
  EN FS: Wildflowers in a red pot, cute.
  cz FS: Polní květiny v červeném květináči, jak roztomilé.
  EN TP: a pot of wildflowers
  cz TP: květináč s polními květinami
  EN FP: a field of wildflowers
  cz FP: louka polních květin
2462 | starry (adjective): full of stars, said about a night sky | loc: hvězdnatý
  EN TS: The starry sky has a moon.
  cz TS: Na hvězdnatém nebi je měsíc.
  EN FS: The starry sky has a rainbow.
  cz FS: Na hvězdnatém nebi je duha.
  EN TP: a starry night sky
  cz TP: hvězdnatá noční obloha
  EN FP: a starry city night
  cz FP: hvězdnatá noc ve městě
2463 | peony (noun): a big round flower with soft ruffled petals | loc: pivoňka
  EN TS: The valley features pink peonies.
  cz TS: V údolí se nacházejí růžové pivoňky.
  EN FS: The valley features pink tulips.
  cz FS: V údolí se nacházejí růžové tulipány.
  EN TP: pink peonies on a hill
  cz TP: růžové pivoňky na kopci
  EN FP: peonies in a vase
  cz FP: pivoňky ve váze
2464 | symmetrical (adjective): the same on both sides, like a mirror | loc: symetrický
  EN TS: The patterns are symmetrical.
  cz TS: Vzory jsou symetrické.
  EN FS: The patterns are colourful.
  cz FS: Vzory jsou barevné.
  EN TP: symmetrical leaf patterns
  cz TP: symetrické vzory listů
  EN FP: a symmetrical building
  cz FP: symetrická budova
2465 | float (verb): to stay up in the air without falling | loc: vznášet se
  EN TS: She is floating. No big deal.
  cz TS: Vznáší se. Nic zvláštního.
  EN FS: She is swimming. No big deal.
  cz FS: Plave. Nic zvláštního.
  EN TP: floating in a blue sky
  cz TP: vznášení na modrém nebi
  EN FP: floating in a pool
  cz FP: vznášení se v bazénu
2466 | crystal (noun): a clear hard stone with flat shiny faces | loc: krystal
  EN TS: Her dress is made of crystals.
  cz TS: Její šaty jsou z krystalů.
  EN FS: Her dress is made of feathers.
  cz FS: Její šaty jsou z peří.
  EN TP: a dress of glowing crystals
  cz TP: šaty ze zářících krystalů
  EN FP: a crystal glass of water
  cz FP: křišťálová sklenice vody
2470 | saxophone (noun): a curved metal wind instrument used in jazz | loc: saxofon
  EN TS: The saxophone has a curved bell.
  cz TS: Saxofon má zahnutý ozvučník.
  EN FS: The saxophone has a straight bell.
  cz FS: Saxofon má rovný ozvučník.
  EN TP: a floating saxophone
  cz TP: vznášející se saxofon
  EN FP: a saxophone player
  cz FP: saxofonista
2471 | bookworm (noun): a person who reads all the time | loc: knihomol
  EN TS: She is such a bookworm.
  cz TS: Ta je ale knihomol.
  EN FS: She is such a gamer.
  cz FS: Ta je ale gamerka.
  EN TP: a bookworm with a book
  cz TP: knihomol s knížkou
  EN FP: a bookworm with a phone
  cz FP: knihomol s mobilem
2472 | uniform (noun): clothing a group wears to be identified | loc: uniforma
  EN TS: Her uniform looks really neat.
  cz TS: Její uniforma vypadá fakt úhledně.
  EN FS: Her coat looks really neat.
  cz FS: Její kabát vypadá fakt úhledně.
  EN TP: a school uniform
  cz TP: školní uniforma
  EN FP: a police uniform
  cz FP: policejní uniforma
2473 | wreath (noun): a ring of leaves hung up as decoration | loc: věnec
  EN TS: The wreath is on a red door.
  cz TS: Věnec visí na červených dveřích.
  EN FS: The wreath is on a blue door.
  cz FS: Věnec visí na modrých dveřích.
  EN TP: a wreath on the door
  cz TP: věnec na dveřích
  EN FP: a wreath on her head
  cz FP: věnec na hlavě
2474 | foam (noun): the mass of small white bubbles on waves | loc: pěna
  EN TS: Wild foam on a stormy sea.
  cz TS: Divoká pěna na rozbouřeném moři.
  EN FS: Wild foam on a calm sea.
  cz FS: Divoká pěna na klidném moři.
  EN TP: foam on stormy waves
  cz TP: pěna na bouřlivých vlnách
  EN FP: coffee with milk foam
  cz FP: káva s mléčnou pěnou
2475 | barefoot (adjective): wearing nothing on your feet | loc: bosý
  EN TS: She is reading barefoot.
  cz TS: Čte si bosá.
  EN FS: She is dancing barefoot.
  cz FS: Tančí bosá.
  EN TP: barefoot on a daybed
  cz TP: bosá na lehátku
  EN FP: barefoot on the beach
  cz FP: bosá na pláži
2477 | messy (adjective): dirty and not in any order | loc: rozcuchaný
  EN TS: The wind made his hair messy.
  cz TS: Kvůli větru má rozcuchané vlasy.
  EN FS: The rain made his hair messy.
  cz FS: Kvůli dešti má rozcuchané vlasy.
  EN TP: messy brown hair
  cz TP: rozcuchané hnědé vlasy
  EN FP: a messy bedroom
  cz FP: nepořádek v ložnici
2478 | doctor (noun): a person licensed to give medical care | loc: lékař
  EN TS: The doctor is smiling at us.
  cz TS: Lékař se na nás usmívá.
  EN FS: The doctor is shouting at us.
  cz FS: Lékař na nás křičí.
  EN TP: a smiling cartoon doctor
  cz TP: usměvavý kreslený lékař
  EN FP: a doctor in surgery
  cz FP: lékař na operačním sále
2480 | present (noun): a gift you give someone | loc: dárek
  EN TS: The car has too many presents!
  cz TS: To auto veze moc dárků!
  EN FS: The car has too many dogs!
  cz FS: To auto veze moc psů!
  EN TP: presents on a car roof
  cz TP: dárky na střeše auta
  EN FP: presents under a tree
  cz FP: dárky pod stromečkem
2481 | globe (noun): a small round model of the Earth on a stand | loc: globus
  EN TS: He is holding a globe.
  cz TS: Drží globus.
  EN FS: He is holding a ball.
  cz FS: Drží míč.
  EN TP: holding a globe
  cz TP: držení globusu
  EN FP: a snow globe
  cz FP: sněžítko
2482 | turret (noun): a small round tower on a big building | loc: věžička
  EN TS: So many turrets on one castle!
  cz TS: Tolik věžiček na jednom hradu!
  EN FS: So many flags on one castle!
  cz FS: Tolik vlajek na jednom hradu!
  EN TP: pointed castle turrets
  cz TP: špičaté hradní věžičky
  EN FP: a tank turret
  cz FP: tanková věž
2483 | dried (adjective): with all the water taken out to keep it | loc: usušený
  EN TS: Dried flowers lie in the book.
  cz TS: V knize leží usušené květiny.
  EN FS: Fresh flowers lie in the book.
  cz FS: V knize leží čerstvé květiny.
  EN TP: dried flowers in a book
  cz TP: usušené květiny v knize
  EN FP: dried fruit in a bowl
  cz FP: sušené ovoce v misce
2484 | steeple (noun): the tall pointed tower of a church | loc: kostelní věž
  EN TS: The church has a tall steeple.
  cz TS: Kostelní věž je vysoká.
  EN FS: The castle has a tall steeple.
  cz FS: Hradní věž je vysoká.
  EN TP: a church steeple in snow
  cz TP: kostelní věž ve sněhu
  EN FP: a steeple in a city
  cz FP: kostelní věž ve městě
2485 | sinister (adjective): looking evil, as if something bad will happen | loc: zlověstný
  EN TS: The crow man looks sinister.
  cz TS: Havraní muž vypadá zlověstně.
  EN FS: The cat man looks sinister.
  cz FS: Kočičí muž vypadá zlověstně.
  EN TP: a sinister crow-headed figure
  cz TP: zlověstná postava s hlavou vrány
  EN FP: a sinister black cat
  cz FP: zlověstná černá kočka
2486 | hieroglyphs (noun): the picture symbols of ancient Egyptian writing | loc: hieroglyfy
  EN TS: Hieroglyphs cover the wall.
  cz TS: Hieroglyfy pokrývají zeď.
  EN FS: Flowers cover the wall.
  cz FS: Květiny pokrývají zeď.
  EN TP: a wall of hieroglyphs
  cz TP: zeď plná hieroglyfů
  EN FP: hieroglyphs in a textbook
  cz FP: hieroglyfy v učebnici
2490 | snowman (noun): a winter figure made of big white frozen balls | loc: sněhulák
  EN TS: Nice hat! Is the snowman cold?
  cz TS: Pěkný klobouk! Není sněhulákovi zima?
  EN FS: Nice hat! Is the dog cold?
  cz FS: Pěkný klobouk! Není pejskovi zima?
  EN TP: a snowman in a hat
  cz TP: sněhulák v klobouku
  EN FP: building a snowman
  cz FP: stavění sněhuláka
2492 | busy (adjective): full of people and activity | loc: rušný
  EN TS: The village is so busy!
  cz TS: Ta vesnice je tak rušná!
  EN FS: The village is so quiet!
  cz FS: Ta vesnice je tak tichá!
  EN TP: a busy snowy village
  cz TP: rušná zasněžená vesnice
  EN FP: a busy summer beach
  cz FP: rušná letní pláž
2493 | quilt (noun): a warm cover sewn from many pieces of cloth | loc: prošívaná deka
  EN TS: The farm is sewn as a quilt.
  cz TS: Farma je ušitá jako prošívaná deka.
  EN FS: The farm is sewn as a flag.
  cz FS: Farma je ušitá jako vlajka.
  EN TP: a quilt of a farm
  cz TP: farma jako prošívaná deka
  EN FP: a quilt on a bed
  cz FP: prošívaná deka na posteli
2494 | victorian (adjective): in the style of 19th-century England | loc: viktoriánský
  EN TS: Victorian street. Is that Sherlock?
  cz TS: Viktoriánská ulice. Je to Sherlock?
  EN FS: Modern street. Is that Sherlock?
  cz FS: Moderní ulice. Je to Sherlock?
  EN TP: a snowy Victorian street
  cz TP: zasněžená viktoriánská ulice
  EN FP: a Victorian tea party
  cz FP: viktoriánský čajový dýchánek
2495 | sparrow (noun): a small brown bird you see everywhere | loc: vrabec
  EN TS: I counted two sparrows.
  cz TS: Napočítal jsem dva vrabce.
  EN FS: I counted four sparrows.
  cz FS: Napočítal jsem čtyři vrabce.
  EN TP: two sparrows on a branch
  cz TP: dva vrabci na větvi
  EN FP: two sparrows in the snow
  cz FP: dva vrabci ve sněhu
2497 | santa claus (noun): the jolly man in red who brings Christmas presents | loc: Santa Claus
  EN TS: Santa Claus is taking a break.
  cz TS: Santa Claus si dává pauzu.
  EN FS: Santa Claus is taking a bath.
  cz FS: Santa Claus si dává koupel.
  EN TP: Santa Claus with presents
  cz TP: Santa Claus s dárky
  EN FP: Santa Claus with reindeer
  cz FP: Santa Claus se soby
2498 | tender (adjective): gentle and full of love | loc: něžný
  EN TS: They share a tender hug.
  cz TS: Je to něžné objetí.
  EN FS: They share a tender kiss.
  cz FS: Je to něžný polibek.
  EN TP: a tender embrace
  cz TP: něžné objetí
  EN FP: a tender steak
  cz FP: křehký steak
2499 | teddy bear (noun): a soft cuddly toy animal for children | loc: plyšový medvídek
  EN TS: Two teddy bears are cuddling.
  cz TS: Dva plyšoví medvídci se mazlí.
  EN FS: Two teddy bears are fighting.
  cz FS: Dva plyšoví medvídci se perou.
  EN TP: teddy bears in the snow
  cz TP: plyšoví medvídci ve sněhu
  EN FP: teddy bears on a bed
  cz FP: plyšoví medvídci na posteli
2500 | laptop (noun): a small computer you can carry and fold shut | loc: notebook
  EN TS: He is typing on a laptop.
  cz TS: Píše na notebooku.
  EN FS: He is typing on a phone.
  cz FS: Píše na mobilu.
  EN TP: typing on a laptop
  cz TP: psaní na notebooku
  EN FP: carrying a laptop
  cz FP: nošení notebooku
2501 | shiva (noun): the Hindu god with blue skin and a trident | loc: Šiva
  EN TS: Shiva is meditating on a rock.
  cz TS: Šiva medituje na skále.
  EN FS: Shiva is meditating in a boat.
  cz FS: Šiva medituje v loďce.
  EN TP: Shiva with a trident
  cz TP: Šiva s trojzubcem
  EN FP: Shiva with a sword
  cz FP: Šiva s mečem
2502 | shrine (noun): a small holy place built to honour someone | loc: svatyně
  EN TS: A forest shrine full of moss.
  cz TS: Lesní svatyně plná mechu.
  EN FS: A desert shrine full of sand.
  cz FS: Pouštní svatyně plná písku.
  EN TP: a mossy forest shrine
  cz TP: mechem porostlá lesní svatyně
  EN FP: a shrine in a city
  cz FP: svatyně ve městě
2504 | krishna (noun): a Hindu god shown with blue skin | loc: Kršna
  EN TS: Krishna has a peacock feather.
  cz TS: Kršna má paví pero.
  EN FS: Krishna has an eagle feather.
  cz FS: Kršna má orlí pero.
  EN TP: Krishna with a crown
  cz TP: Kršna s korunou
  EN FP: Krishna with a flute
  cz FP: Kršna s flétnou
2505 | rifle (noun): a long gun you hold with two hands | loc: puška
  EN TS: Rain, a rifle and zero complaints.
  cz TS: Déšť, puška a nula stížností.
  EN FS: Sun, a rifle and zero complaints.
  cz FS: Slunce, puška a nula stížností.
  EN TP: a long scoped rifle
  cz TP: dlouhá puška s puškohledem
  EN FP: a rifle on the ground
  cz FP: puška na zemi
2506 | geometric (adjective): made of simple regular shapes like squares | loc: geometrický
  EN TS: Everything here is geometric.
  cz TS: Všechno tady je geometrické.
  EN FS: Everything here is blue.
  cz FS: Všechno tady je modré.
  EN TP: pink geometric shapes
  cz TP: růžové geometrické tvary
  EN FP: a geometric maths test
  cz FP: geometrický test z matiky
2509 | lavender (noun): a purple plant with a famous sweet smell | loc: levandule
  EN TS: A path runs through lavender.
  cz TS: Cesta vede levandulí.
  EN FS: A path runs through wheat.
  cz FS: Cesta vede pšenicí.
  EN TP: rows of purple lavender
  cz TP: řady fialové levandule
  EN FP: a bottle of lavender oil
  cz FP: lahvička levandulového oleje
2510 | bedtime (noun): the time when you go to sleep | loc: čas spánku
  EN TS: Bedtime for a boy and a cat!
  cz TS: Čas spánku pro kluka a kočku!
  EN FS: Bedtime for a boy and a dog!
  cz FS: Čas spánku pro kluka a psa!
  EN TP: bedtime under a blanket
  cz TP: čas spánku pod dekou
  EN FP: bedtime story with a book
  cz FP: pohádka na dobrou noc z knížky
2511 | spark (noun): a tiny glowing bit of fire in the air | loc: jiskra
  EN TS: Sparks are flying around them.
  cz TS: Kolem nich létají jiskry.
  EN FS: Leaves are flying around them.
  cz FS: Kolem nich létají listy.
  EN TP: sparks around a couple
  cz TP: jiskry kolem páru
  EN FP: a spark from a plug
  cz FP: jiskra ze zásuvky
2512 | coloring book (noun): a set of outline pictures for kids to paint in | loc: omalovánka
  EN TS: This coloring book needs you.
  cz TS: Tahle omalovánka potřebuje tebe.
  EN FS: This photo book needs you.
  cz FS: Tohle fotoalbum potřebuje tebe.
  EN TP: a coloring book page
  cz TP: stránka z omalovánky
  EN FP: a coloring book cover
  cz FP: obal omalovánky
2514 | herbs (noun): leafy plants used in cooking, tea or medicine | loc: bylinky
  EN TS: She's adding herbs to a bowl.
  cz TS: Přidává bylinky do misky.
  EN FS: She's adding salt to a bowl.
  cz FS: Přidává sůl do misky.
  EN TP: sprinkling dried herbs
  cz TP: sypání sušených bylinek
  EN FP: chopping fresh herbs
  cz FP: sekání čerstvých bylinek
2516 | year (noun): a period of twelve months | loc: rok
  EN TS: The year is 2024.
  cz TS: Je rok 2024.
  EN FS: The year is 2025.
  cz FS: Je rok 2025.
  EN TP: the year 2024 glowing
  cz TP: zářící rok 2024
  EN FP: the year 2025
  cz FP: rok 2025
2519 | backyard (noun): the private grassy area behind a house | loc: dvorek za domem
  EN TS: Did you see this backyard? A flamingo!
  cz TS: Viděls ten dvorek za domem? Plameňák!
  EN FS: Did you see this backyard? A swing!
  cz FS: Viděls ten dvorek za domem? Houpačka!
  EN TP: a busy little backyard
  cz TP: rušný malý dvorek za domem
  EN FP: a backyard vegetable patch
  cz FP: zeleninový záhon za domem
2520 | sacred (adjective): holy and connected to religion | loc: posvátný
  EN TS: A sacred light from above!
  cz TS: Posvátné světlo shora!
  EN FS: A sacred light from below!
  cz FS: Posvátné světlo zdola!
  EN TP: a sacred beam of light
  cz TP: posvátný paprsek světla
  EN FP: a sacred river
  cz FP: posvátná řeka
2522 | clover (noun): a small plant with round leaves, a lucky sign | loc: jetel
  EN TS: The clovers have four leaves.
  cz TS: Jetel má čtyři lístky.
  EN FS: The clovers have three leaves.
  cz FS: Jetel má tři lístky.
  EN TP: four-leaf clovers
  cz TP: čtyřlistý jetel
  EN FP: a clover field with cows
  cz FP: pole jetele s kravami
2523 | snowfall (noun): snow coming down from the sky | loc: sněžení
  EN TS: The snowfall is heavy tonight.
  cz TS: Sněžení je dnes v noci husté.
  EN FS: The rainfall is heavy tonight.
  cz FS: Déšť je dnes v noci hustý.
  EN TP: heavy snowfall over a village
  cz TP: husté sněžení nad vesnicí
  EN FP: light snowfall in a city
  cz FP: slabé sněžení ve městě
2524 | walking stick (noun): a stick you lean on to help you walk | loc: vycházková hůl
  EN TS: He has a walking stick.
  cz TS: Má vycházkovou hůl.
  EN FS: He has a big umbrella.
  cz FS: Má velký deštník.
  EN TP: leaning on a walking stick
  cz TP: opírání o vycházkovou hůl
  EN FP: a walking stick for hiking
  cz FP: trekingová hůl na túru
2525 | lift (verb): to take hold of something and move it | loc: zvednout | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Mum is lifting her baby bear.
  cz TS: Máma zvedá své medvídě.
  EN FS: Mum is lifting her baby fox.
  cz FS: Máma zvedá své lišče.
  EN TP: to lift the cub up
  cz TP: zvednout mládě
  EN FP: to lift a heavy box
  cz FP: zvednout těžkou krabici
2526 | poseidon (noun): the ancient Greek god of the sea | loc: Poseidón
  EN TS: Poseidon has two spears.
  cz TS: Poseidón má dvě kopí.
  EN FS: Poseidon has two swords.
  cz FS: Poseidón má dva meče.
  EN TP: Poseidon rising from waves
  cz TP: Poseidón vystupující z vln
  EN FP: Poseidon sinking a ship
  cz FP: Poseidón potápějící loď
2527 | gas mask (noun): a mask that protects your face from dangerous air | loc: plynová maska
  EN TS: The DJ wears a gas mask. Why?
  cz TS: Dýdžej má plynovou masku. Proč?
  EN FS: The DJ wears a ski mask. Why?
  cz FS: Dýdžej má lyžařskou kuklu. Proč?
  EN TP: gas mask and headphones
  cz TP: plynová maska a sluchátka
  EN FP: gas mask and goggles
  cz FP: plynová maska a brýle
2528 | top hat (noun): a tall formal hat with a flat top | loc: cylindr
  EN TS: A purple top hat? Bold choice.
  cz TS: Fialový cylindr? Odvážná volba.
  EN FS: A black top hat? Bold choice.
  cz FS: Černý cylindr? Odvážná volba.
  EN TP: a shiny purple top hat
  cz TP: lesklý fialový cylindr
  EN FP: a magician's top hat
  cz FP: kouzelníkův cylindr
2529 | gentle (adjective): kind, calm and soft in the way you act | loc: jemný
  EN TS: He has a gentle face.
  cz TS: Má jemnou tvář.
  EN FS: He has a gentle dog.
  cz FS: Má jemného psa.
  EN TP: a gentle calm face
  cz TP: jemná klidná tvář
  EN FP: a gentle calm sea
  cz FP: jemné klidné moře
2530 | candlelight (noun): the warm light of a burning candle | loc: světlo svíčky
  EN TS: Candlelight glows among roses.
  cz TS: Světlo svíčky září mezi růžemi.
  EN FS: Candlelight glows among books.
  cz FS: Světlo svíčky září mezi knihami.
  EN TP: candlelight in a lantern
  cz TP: světlo svíčky v lucerně
  EN FP: candlelight on a cake
  cz FP: světlo svíčky na dortu
2531 | sparkle (verb): to shine with many small flashing points | loc: třpytit se
  EN TS: Even the sky sparkles for them.
  cz TS: I nebe se pro ně třpytí.
  EN FS: Even the sea sparkles for them.
  cz FS: I moře se pro ně třpytí.
  EN TP: a sparkling night sky
  cz TP: třpytící se noční obloha
  EN FP: sparkling water in a glass
  cz FP: perlivá voda ve sklenici
2532 | ruffle (noun): a strip of frilly fabric used as trim | loc: volán
  EN TS: Her dress has grey ruffles.
  cz TS: Její šaty mají šedé volány.
  EN FS: Her dress has red ruffles.
  cz FS: Její šaty mají červené volány.
  EN TP: a dress with grey ruffles
  cz TP: šaty se šedými volány
  EN FP: ruffles on a red hat
  cz FP: volány na červeném klobouku
2533 | misty (adjective): covered in thin fog that hides things | loc: mlhavý
  EN TS: The far end is misty.
  cz TS: Vzadu je to mlhavé.
  EN FS: The far end is sunny.
  cz FS: Vzadu je to slunečné.
  EN TP: a misty old street
  cz TP: mlhavá stará ulice
  EN FP: a misty mountain lake
  cz FP: mlhavé horské jezero
2536 | chimpanzee (noun): a large clever African ape with dark hair | loc: šimpanz
  EN TS: This chimpanzee looks like a serious biker.
  cz TS: Tenhle šimpanz vypadá jako vážný motorkář.
  EN FS: This chimpanzee looks like a serious surfer.
  cz FS: Tenhle šimpanz vypadá jako vážný surfař.
  EN TP: a chimpanzee on a motorbike
  cz TP: šimpanz na motorce
  EN FP: a chimpanzee in a tree
  cz FP: šimpanz na stromě
2537 | bedtime story (noun): a story read to children before sleep | loc: pohádka na dobrou noc
  EN TS: The girl is reading a bedtime story.
  cz TS: Holka čte pohádku na dobrou noc.
  EN FS: The boy is reading a bedtime story.
  cz FS: Kluk čte pohádku na dobrou noc.
  EN TP: a bedtime story in bed
  cz TP: pohádka na dobrou noc v posteli
  EN FP: a bedtime story on TV
  cz FP: pohádka na dobrou noc v televizi
2538 | little red riding hood (noun): the fairy-tale girl in a red hooded cloak | loc: Červená karkulka
  EN TS: Little Red Riding Hood trusts the wolf.
  cz TS: Červená karkulka věří vlkovi.
  EN FS: Little Red Riding Hood trusts the bear.
  cz FS: Červená karkulka věří medvědovi.
  EN TP: Little Red Riding Hood's wolf
  cz TP: vlk Červené karkulky
  EN FP: Little Red Riding Hood's gran
  cz FP: babička Červené karkulky
2539 | artificial intelligence (noun): computer systems that think and learn | loc: umělá inteligence
  EN TS: Artificial intelligence lives in her head.
  cz TS: V její hlavě žije umělá inteligence.
  EN FS: Artificial intelligence lives in her car.
  cz FS: V jejím autě žije umělá inteligence.
  EN TP: artificial intelligence robot
  cz TP: robot s umělou inteligencí
  EN FP: artificial intelligence app
  cz FP: aplikace s umělou inteligencí
2540 | dungeon (noun): a dark prison under a castle | loc: žalář
  EN TS: What a "cosy" dungeon.
  cz TS: Jaký „útulný“ žalář.
  EN FS: What a "cosy" garden.
  cz FS: Jaká „útulná“ zahrada.
  EN TP: a dark dungeon with candles
  cz TP: temný žalář se svíčkami
  EN FP: a dark cellar with wine
  cz FP: temný sklep s vínem
2541 | staircase (noun): a set of stairs inside a building | loc: schodiště
  EN TS: Nobody cleaned this staircase.
  cz TS: Tohle schodiště nikdo neuklízel.
  EN FS: Nobody cleaned this kitchen.
  cz FS: Tuhle kuchyň nikdo neuklízel.
  EN TP: a crumbling stone staircase
  cz TP: rozpadající se kamenné schodiště
  EN FP: a crumbling stone bridge
  cz FP: rozpadající se kamenný most
2543 | tusk (noun): one of the two long teeth of an elephant | loc: kel | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The elephant has long tusks.
  cz TS: Slon má dlouhé kly.
  EN FS: The elephant has short tusks.
  cz FS: Slon má krátké kly.
  EN TP: two long white tusks
  cz TP: dva dlouhé bílé kly
  EN FP: a walrus with tusks
  cz FP: mrož s kly
2544 | hanuman (noun): the Hindu monkey god with a crown and mace | loc: Hanuman
  EN TS: Hanuman has a golden crown.
  cz TS: Hanuman má zlatou korunu.
  EN FS: Hanuman has a silver crown.
  cz FS: Hanuman má stříbrnou korunu.
  EN TP: Hanuman with a golden staff
  cz TP: Hanuman se zlatým žezlem
  EN FP: Hanuman with a sword
  cz FP: Hanuman s mečem
2545 | worship (verb): to show deep love and respect to a god | loc: uctívat
  EN TS: The monkey is worshipping.
  cz TS: Opice uctívá boha.
  EN FS: The monkey is sleeping.
  cz FS: Opice spí.
  EN TP: worshipping on stone steps
  cz TP: uctívání na kamenných schodech
  EN FP: worshipping a football star
  cz FP: uctívání fotbalové hvězdy
2546 | spacious (adjective): having a lot of open room inside | loc: prostorný
  EN TS: This hall is "quite" spacious.
  cz TS: Tahle hala je „docela“ prostorná.
  EN FS: This hall is "quite" tiny.
  cz FS: Tahle hala je „docela“ malinká.
  EN TP: a spacious hall
  cz TP: prostorná hala
  EN FP: a spacious car
  cz FP: prostorné auto
2547 | toadstool (noun): a mushroom with a red cap and white spots | loc: muchomůrka
  EN TS: These toadstools are massive!
  cz TS: Ty muchomůrky jsou obří!
  EN FS: These toadstools are tiny!
  cz FS: Ty muchomůrky jsou maličké!
  EN TP: giant red toadstools
  cz TP: obří červené muchomůrky
  EN FP: toadstools in a basket
  cz FP: muchomůrky v košíku
2548 | barrel (noun): a big round wooden container | loc: sud
  EN TS: So many barrels. Beer, maybe?
  cz TS: Tolik sudů. Že by pivo?
  EN FS: So many bikes. Beer, maybe?
  cz FS: Tolik kol. Že by pivo?
  EN TP: stacked wooden barrels
  cz TP: naskládané dřevěné sudy
  EN FP: a barrel of cold beer
  cz FP: sud studeného piva
2549 | father (noun): a male parent | loc: otec
  EN TS: Father and son are cheering!
  cz TS: Otec se synem fandí!
  EN FS: Father and son are crying!
  cz FS: Otec se synem pláčou!
  EN TP: a father carrying his son
  cz TP: otec nesoucí syna
  EN FP: a father carrying shopping
  cz FP: otec nesoucí nákup
2550 | cross-legged (adverb): sitting with your legs bent and crossed | loc: se zkříženýma nohama
  EN TS: She sits cross-legged, barefoot.
  cz TS: Sedí se zkříženýma nohama, bosá.
  EN FS: She sits cross-legged in boots.
  cz FS: Sedí se zkříženýma nohama, v botách.
  EN TP: sitting cross-legged
  cz TP: sedět se zkříženýma nohama
  EN FP: standing cross-legged
  cz FP: stát se zkříženýma nohama
2551 | miami (noun): the Florida beach city of neon and palms | loc: Miami
  EN TS: Miami vibes: palms and neon.
  cz TS: Miami vibes: palmy a neony.
  EN FS: Miami vibes: snow and neon.
  cz FS: Miami vibes: sníh a neony.
  EN TP: a neon Miami street
  cz TP: neonová ulice v Miami
  EN FP: a Miami beach at noon
  cz FP: pláž v Miami v poledne
2552 | virtual reality (noun): a computer world seen through special goggles | loc: virtuální realita
  EN TS: She is in virtual reality.
  cz TS: Je ve virtuální realitě.
  EN FS: She is in a swimming pool.
  cz FS: Je v bazénu.
  EN TP: a virtual reality headset
  cz TP: headset pro virtuální realitu
  EN FP: virtual reality at school
  cz FP: virtuální realita ve škole
2556 | brain (noun): the organ in the head we think with | loc: mozek
  EN TS: Fact: the brain is glowing.
  cz TS: Fakt: mozek září.
  EN FS: Fact: the heart is glowing.
  cz FS: Fakt: srdce září.
  EN TP: a glowing brain
  cz TP: zářící mozek
  EN FP: a brain in a jar
  cz FP: mozek ve sklenici
2557 | sailboat (noun): a small boat pushed along by the wind | loc: plachetnice
  EN TS: Wait, the sailboat is glass?
  cz TS: Počkat, ta plachetnice je ze skla?
  EN FS: Wait, the sailboat is wood?
  cz FS: Počkat, ta plachetnice je ze dřeva?
  EN TP: a glass sailboat
  cz TP: skleněná plachetnice
  EN FP: a sailboat in a bottle
  cz FP: plachetnice v lahvi
2558 | freedom (noun): the feeling of being free and held by nothing | loc: svoboda
  EN TS: She is flying. Pure freedom!
  cz TS: Letí. Čistá svoboda!
  EN FS: She is swimming. Pure freedom!
  cz FS: Plave. Čistá svoboda!
  EN TP: freedom above the sea
  cz TP: svoboda nad mořem
  EN FP: freedom under the sea
  cz FP: svoboda pod mořem
2559 | coin (noun): a flat metal piece used as money | loc: mince
  EN TS: This tree grows coins!
  cz TS: Na tomhle stromě rostou mince!
  EN FS: This tree grows apples!
  cz FS: Na tomhle stromě rostou jablka!
  EN TP: coins falling from a tree
  cz TP: mince padající ze stromu
  EN FP: coins in a piggy bank
  cz FP: mince v prasátku
2560 | miracle (noun): an amazing event that cannot be explained | loc: zázrak
  EN TS: Walking on water? A miracle!
  cz TS: Chůze po vodě? Zázrak!
  EN FS: Walking on fire? A miracle!
  cz FS: Chůze po ohni? Zázrak!
  EN TP: a miracle on the ocean
  cz TP: zázrak na oceánu
  EN FP: a miracle cure for colds
  cz FP: zázračný lék na rýmu
2562 | detective (noun): a person whose job is to solve crimes | loc: detektiv
  EN TS: Rainy night, lonely detective.
  cz TS: Deštivá noc, osamělý detektiv.
  EN FS: Sunny day, lonely detective.
  cz FS: Slunečný den, osamělý detektiv.
  EN TP: a detective in the rain
  cz TP: detektiv v dešti
  EN FP: a crime scene detective
  cz FP: detektiv na místě činu
2563 | merchant (noun): a person who buys and sells goods | loc: kupec
  EN TS: A merchant is checking grain.
  cz TS: Kupec kontroluje obilí.
  EN FS: A merchant is checking coins.
  cz FS: Kupec kontroluje mince.
  EN TP: a merchant by candlelight
  cz TP: kupec při světle svíčky
  EN FP: a merchant at the market
  cz FP: kupec na trhu
2564 | hydrangea (noun): a garden plant with round clusters of flowers | loc: hortenzie
  EN TS: This hydrangea cluster is blue.
  cz TS: Tenhle květ hortenzie je modrý.
  EN FS: This hydrangea cluster is pink.
  cz FS: Tenhle květ hortenzie je růžový.
  EN TP: a blue hydrangea cluster
  cz TP: modrý květ hortenzie
  EN FP: a hydrangea in a vase
  cz FP: hortenzie ve váze
2567 | saint (noun): a very holy person honoured in religion | loc: světec | translator note: veil suggests a female saint: used světice (feminine of světec)
  EN TS: The saint wears a white veil.
  cz TS: Světice má bílý závoj.
  EN FS: The saint wears a red veil.
  cz FS: Světice má červený závoj.
  EN TP: a saint with a halo
  cz TP: světice se svatozáří
  EN FP: a saint on a horse
  cz FP: světec na koni
2571 | grumpy (adjective): in a bad mood and easily annoyed | loc: mrzutý
  EN TS: The boy is grumpy. Again.
  cz TS: Ten kluk je mrzutý. Zase.
  EN FS: The girl is grumpy. Again.
  cz FS: Ta holka je mrzutá. Zase.
  EN TP: a grumpy little boy
  cz TP: mrzutý malý kluk
  EN FP: a grumpy old man
  cz FP: mrzutý starý pán
2572 | triangle (noun): a flat shape with three straight sides | loc: trojúhelník
  EN TS: The triangles are glowing.
  cz TS: Trojúhelníky září.
  EN FS: The circles are glowing.
  cz FS: Kruhy září.
  EN TP: glowing neon triangles
  cz TP: zářící neonové trojúhelníky
  EN FP: a triangle road sign
  cz FP: výstražný trojúhelník
2575 | anonymous (adjective): with the name and face kept hidden | loc: anonymní
  EN TS: The DJ is totally anonymous.
  cz TS: Ten dýdžej je totálně anonymní.
  EN FS: The chef is totally anonymous.
  cz FS: Ten kuchař je totálně anonymní.
  EN TP: an anonymous hooded DJ
  cz TP: anonymní dýdžej v kapuci
  EN FP: an anonymous letter
  cz FP: anonymní dopis
2576 | heartbroken (adjective): extremely sad after losing someone you love | loc: zlomený žalem
  EN TS: He is heartbroken in Paris.
  cz TS: V Paříži je zlomený žalem.
  EN FS: He is heartbroken in Rome.
  cz FS: V Římě je zlomený žalem.
  EN TP: heartbroken in the rain
  cz TP: zlomený žalem v dešti
  EN FP: heartbroken in the snow
  cz FP: zlomený žalem ve sněhu
2578 | visor (noun): the clear front part of a helmet | loc: hledí
  EN TS: The visor is like a mirror.
  cz TS: Hledí je jako zrcadlo.
  EN FS: The visor is like a window.
  cz FS: Hledí je jako okno.
  EN TP: a mirrored helmet visor
  cz TP: zrcadlové hledí helmy
  EN FP: a cap with a visor
  cz FP: čepice s kšiltem
2579 | weird (adjective): strange and not normal | loc: divný
  EN TS: Her glasses are super weird.
  cz TS: Její brýle jsou fakt divné.
  EN FS: Her hat is super weird.
  cz FS: Její klobouk je fakt divný.
  EN TP: a weird retro machine
  cz TP: divný retro stroj
  EN FP: a weird old car
  cz FP: divné staré auto
2580 | archer (noun): a person who shoots with a bow and arrow | loc: lukostřelec
  EN TS: The archer is drawing his bow.
  cz TS: Lukostřelec napíná luk.
  EN FS: The archer is drawing a sword.
  cz FS: Lukostřelec tasí meč.
  EN TP: a statue of an archer
  cz TP: socha lukostřelce
  EN FP: a painting of an archer
  cz FP: obraz lukostřelce
2581 | flute (noun): a long thin instrument you blow across | loc: flétna
  EN TS: He is playing a bamboo flute.
  cz TS: Hraje na bambusovou flétnu.
  EN FS: He is playing a bamboo drum.
  cz FS: Hraje na bambusový buben.
  EN TP: playing a bamboo flute
  cz TP: hraní na bambusovou flétnu
  EN FP: carving a bamboo flute
  cz FP: vyřezávání bambusové flétny
2583 | enjoy (verb): to get pleasure from something | loc: užívat si
  EN TS: She is enjoying the vibes.
  cz TS: Užívá si tu atmošku.
  EN FS: She is enjoying the pizza.
  cz FS: Užívá si tu pizzu.
  EN TP: enjoying the music
  cz TP: užívat si hudbu
  EN FP: enjoying the sun
  cz FP: užívat si sluníčko
2584 | baptism (noun): a religious ceremony using water | loc: křest
  EN TS: It's a baptism in a river.
  cz TS: Je to křest v řece.
  EN FS: It's a baptism in a church.
  cz FS: Je to křest v kostele.
  EN TP: a baptism in the river
  cz TP: křest v řece
  EN FP: a church baptism
  cz FP: křest v kostele
2586 | friendship (noun): the bond between friends who care for each other | loc: přátelství
  EN TS: Best friendship ever: a giant robot and a little girl.
  cz TS: Nejlepší přátelství na světě: obří robot a malá holka.
  EN FS: Best friendship ever: a giant dog and a little girl.
  cz FS: Nejlepší přátelství na světě: obří pes a malá holka.
  EN TP: an unlikely friendship
  cz TP: nečekané přátelství
  EN FP: a friendship bracelet
  cz FP: náramek přátelství
2594 | learn (verb): to get new knowledge or skills | loc: učit se | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The robot is learning about itself.
  cz TS: Robot se učí o sobě.
  EN FS: The robot is learning about cats.
  cz FS: Robot se učí o kočkách.
  EN TP: a robot learning to read
  cz TP: robot se učí číst
  EN FP: a robot learning to fly
  cz FP: robot se učí létat
2595 | grand piano (noun): a large piano with a big lid that opens up | loc: koncertní křídlo
  EN TS: Someone left a grand piano outside.
  cz TS: Někdo nechal koncertní křídlo venku.
  EN FS: Someone left a grand piano inside.
  cz FS: Někdo nechal koncertní křídlo uvnitř.
  EN TP: a grand piano outside
  cz TP: koncertní křídlo venku
  EN FP: a grand piano inside
  cz FP: koncertní křídlo uvnitř
2600 | beetle (noun): an insect with a hard shiny back | loc: brouk
  EN TS: Bro, two beetles are chilling.
  cz TS: Kámo, dva brouci chillují.
  EN FS: Bro, two snails are chilling.
  cz FS: Kámo, dva šneci chillují.
  EN TP: beetles crawling on leaves
  cz TP: brouci lezoucí po listech
  EN FP: beetles flying over flowers
  cz FP: brouci létající nad květy
2601 | kneel (verb): to go down and rest on your knees | loc: kleknout si | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The man is kneeling in prayer.
  cz TS: Muž si klekl k modlitbě.
  EN FS: The man is sitting in prayer.
  cz FS: Muž si sedl k modlitbě.
  EN TP: kneeling on stone ground
  cz TP: kleknout si na kamennou zem
  EN FP: kneeling on a soft sofa
  cz FP: kleknout si na měkkou pohovku
2602 | ski (verb): to slide over snow on long narrow boards | loc: lyžovat | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: They are skiing down so fast.
  cz TS: Lyžují dolů hrozně rychle.
  EN FS: They are skiing up so fast.
  cz FS: Lyžují nahoru hrozně rychle.
  EN TP: skiing down a steep slope
  cz TP: lyžování dolů prudkým svahem
  EN FP: skiing on a flat road
  cz FP: lyžování po rovné silnici
2603 | sheet music (noun): printed paper with the notes of a piece | loc: noty
  EN TS: The sheet music is handwritten.
  cz TS: Noty jsou psané ručně.
  EN FS: The sheet music is printed out.
  cz FS: Noty jsou vytištěné.
  EN TP: old handwritten sheet music
  cz TP: staré ručně psané noty
  EN FP: new printed sheet music
  cz FP: nové tištěné noty
2604 | lifeless (adjective): dead-looking, with no life or leaves | loc: bezživotný
  EN TS: A lifeless tree, a green moon.
  cz TS: Bezživotný strom, zelený měsíc.
  EN FS: A lifeless tree, a white moon.
  cz FS: Bezživotný strom, bílý měsíc.
  EN TP: a lifeless tree on rocks
  cz TP: bezživotný strom na skalách
  EN FP: a lifeless potted tree
  cz FP: bezživotný strom v květináči
2605 | cradle (verb): to hold someone gently in your arms | loc: chovat v náručí
  EN TS: He is cradling a baby.
  cz TS: Chová v náručí miminko.
  EN FS: He is cradling a lamb.
  cz FS: Chová v náručí jehně.
  EN TP: to cradle a baby
  cz TP: chovat miminko v náručí
  EN FP: to cradle a phone
  cz FP: chovat telefon v náručí
2606 | clockwork (noun): machinery of gears and springs inside a clock | loc: hodinový strojek
  EN TS: Her head is pure clockwork.
  cz TS: Její hlava je čistý hodinový strojek.
  EN FS: Her head is pure glass.
  cz FS: Její hlava je čisté sklo.
  EN TP: a head full of clockwork
  cz TP: hlava plná hodinových strojků
  EN FP: a clockwork toy mouse
  cz FP: mechanická myška na klíček
2607 | wear (verb): to be dressed in something | loc: nosit
  EN TS: The cats wear formal coats.
  cz TS: Kočky nosí formální kabáty.
  EN FS: The dogs wear formal coats.
  cz FS: Psi nosí formální kabáty.
  EN TP: cats wearing long coats
  cz TP: kočky nosící dlouhé kabáty
  EN FP: cats wearing collars
  cz FP: kočky nosící obojky
2611 | buckle (noun): the metal fastener that closes a belt | loc: přezka
  EN TS: His belt has a metal buckle.
  cz TS: Jeho pásek má kovovou přezku.
  EN FS: His bag has a metal buckle.
  cz FS: Jeho taška má kovovou přezku.
  EN TP: a metal belt buckle
  cz TP: kovová přezka opasku
  EN FP: buckling a seatbelt
  cz FP: zapínání bezpečnostního pásu
2612 | bud (noun): a flower that has not opened yet | loc: poupě
  EN TS: Two buds have not opened yet.
  cz TS: Dvě poupata se ještě neotevřela.
  EN FS: Two buds have opened already.
  cz FS: Dvě poupata se už otevřela.
  EN TP: two closed red buds
  cz TP: dvě zavřená červená poupata
  EN FP: two open red buds
  cz FP: dvě otevřená červená poupata
2614 | minaret (noun): the tall thin tower of a mosque | loc: minaret
  EN TS: Two boys are near a minaret.
  cz TS: Dva kluci jsou u minaretu.
  EN FS: Two girls are near a minaret.
  cz FS: Dvě holky jsou u minaretu.
  EN TP: walking toward a minaret
  cz TP: chůze k minaretu
  EN FP: climbing up a minaret
  cz FP: lezení na minaret
2618 | handwriting (noun): words written by hand, not printed | loc: rukopis
  EN TS: The handwriting is in cursive.
  cz TS: Rukopis je psacím písmem.
  EN FS: The handwriting is in print.
  cz FS: Rukopis je tiskacím písmem.
  EN TP: faded cursive handwriting
  cz TP: vybledlý psací rukopis
  EN FP: neat printed handwriting
  cz FP: úhledný tiskací rukopis
2621 | mast (noun): the tall pole that stands up from a deck | loc: stěžeň
  EN TS: The mast has lots of rigging.
  cz TS: Stěžeň má spoustu lanoví.
  EN FS: The mast has lots of flags.
  cz FS: Stěžeň má spoustu vlajek.
  EN TP: a tall mast with rigging
  cz TP: vysoký stěžeň s lanovím
  EN FP: a mast with pirate flags
  cz FP: stěžeň s pirátskými vlajkami
2622 | statue of liberty (noun): a green statue of a woman holding a torch | loc: Socha svobody
  EN TS: A tiny Statue of Liberty!
  cz TS: Malinká Socha svobody!
  EN FS: A tiny Eiffel Tower!
  cz FS: Malinká Eiffelova věž!
  EN TP: a mini Statue of Liberty
  cz TP: mini Socha svobody
  EN FP: a Statue of Liberty costume
  cz FP: kostým Sochy svobody
2623 | ivy (noun): a green plant that climbs walls and trees | loc: břečťan
  EN TS: Ivy covers the bookshelf.
  cz TS: Knihovnu pokrývá břečťan.
  EN FS: Snow covers the bookshelf.
  cz FS: Knihovnu pokrývá sníh.
  EN TP: a bookshelf covered in ivy
  cz TP: knihovna porostlá břečťanem
  EN FP: a castle covered in ivy
  cz FP: hrad porostlý břečťanem
2625 | engineer (noun): a person who plans and builds machines | loc: inženýr
  EN TS: The engineer dreams of cranes.
  cz TS: Inženýr sní o jeřábech.
  EN FS: The engineer dreams of horses.
  cz FS: Inženýr sní o koních.
  EN TP: an engineer's hard hat
  cz TP: přilba inženýra
  EN FP: an engineer at a computer
  cz FP: inženýr u počítače
2626 | bald (adjective): having no hair on the head | loc: plešatý
  EN TS: A city lives in his bald head.
  cz TS: V jeho plešaté hlavě žije město.
  EN FS: A farm lives in his bald head.
  cz FS: V jeho plešaté hlavě žije farma.
  EN TP: a bald head in profile
  cz TP: plešatá hlava z profilu
  EN FP: a bald head with glasses
  cz FP: plešatá hlava s brýlemi
2629 | pigtails (noun): hair tied in two bunches, one each side | loc: culíky
  EN TS: Her hair is in two pigtails.
  cz TS: Má vlasy ve dvou culících.
  EN FS: Her hair is in two buns.
  cz FS: Má vlasy ve dvou drdolech.
  EN TP: two long braided pigtails
  cz TP: dva dlouhé pletené culíky
  EN FP: two short curly pigtails
  cz FP: dva krátké kudrnaté culíky
2631 | lens (noun): the round glass in glasses or a camera | loc: čočka
  EN TS: Her goggles have round lenses.
  cz TS: Její brýle mají kulaté čočky.
  EN FS: Her goggles have no lenses.
  cz FS: Její brýle nemají čočky.
  EN TP: round tinted lenses
  cz TP: kulaté tónované čočky
  EN FP: a lens on a camera
  cz FP: čočka na foťáku
2633 | beam (noun): a line of light shining from something | loc: paprsek
  EN TS: That tree is a disco. Look at the beams!
  cz TS: Ten strom je diskotéka. Koukej na ty paprsky!
  EN FS: That tree is a disco. Look at the birds!
  cz FS: Ten strom je diskotéka. Koukej na ty ptáky!
  EN TP: beams of coloured light
  cz TP: paprsky barevného světla
  EN FP: wooden beams of a roof
  cz FP: dřevěné trámy střechy
2634 | cork (noun): the round plug that closes a bottle neck | loc: korková zátka
  EN TS: Every bottle has a cork.
  cz TS: Každá láhev má korkovou zátku.
  EN FS: Every bottle has a straw.
  cz FS: Každá láhev má brčko.
  EN TP: bottles closed with corks
  cz TP: láhve zavřené korkovými zátkami
  EN FP: a cork board with notes
  cz FP: korková nástěnka s lístečky
2635 | magnolia (noun): a big cup-shaped flower that grows on a tree | loc: magnólie
  EN TS: The magnolia is creamy white.
  cz TS: Magnólie je krémově bílá.
  EN FS: The magnolia is bright yellow.
  cz FS: Magnólie je jasně žlutá.
  EN TP: an open magnolia flower
  cz TP: rozkvetlý květ magnólie
  EN FP: a magnolia tree
  cz FP: strom magnólie
2641 | ray (noun): a narrow line of light from a bright source | loc: paprsek
  EN TS: Rays are filling the sky!
  cz TS: Paprsky zaplňují oblohu!
  EN FS: Rays are filling the room!
  cz FS: Paprsky zaplňují pokoj!
  EN TP: golden rays of light
  cz TP: zlaté paprsky světla
  EN FP: rays through a window
  cz FP: paprsky oknem
2648 | ant (noun): a tiny insect that lives in large groups | loc: mravenec
  EN TS: This ant is bigger than me!
  cz TS: Tenhle mravenec je větší než já!
  EN FS: This bee is bigger than me!
  cz FS: Tahle včela je větší než já!
  EN TP: a huge black ant
  cz TP: obří černý mravenec
  EN FP: a huge ant hill
  cz FP: obří mraveniště
2649 | goggles (noun): big glasses with a band that cover your eyes | loc: ochranné brýle
  EN TS: Those goggles are massive!
  cz TS: Ty ochranné brýle jsou obří!
  EN FS: Those earrings are massive!
  cz FS: Ty náušnice jsou obří!
  EN TP: glowing goggles on her eyes
  cz TP: zářící ochranné brýle na očích
  EN FP: goggles for swimming
  cz FP: brýle na plavání
2651 | spots (noun): small round marks on a surface | loc: tečky
  EN TS: The red roof has white spots.
  cz TS: Červená střecha má bílé tečky.
  EN FS: The red roof has black spots.
  cz FS: Červená střecha má černé tečky.
  EN TP: a cap with white spots
  cz TP: čepice s bílými tečkami
  EN FP: a dog with white spots
  cz FP: pes s bílými tečkami
